Motivations
    d4 - You Asked, So I'll
        Tell you a blatant lie, because I don't like you or because I'm afraid.
        Tell you a half-truth, because I don't trust you or because I'm afraid.
        Tell you the truth, but mix up all the details, because I want to trust you, but I'm afraid.
        Tell you the truth, because I like and trust you, or I need help.

    d20 - Why Am I Doing This?
        To gain wealth.
        To gain power.
        To fulfill a promise.
        To get revenge.
        To get justice.
        For the glory.
        To gain the favor of someone.
        To help a friend.
        To stop an event.
        To pay a debt.
        To solve a mystery.
        To escape from a problem.
        To thwart an enemy.
        To expose the truth.
        To cover up the truth.
        To gain my freedom.
        To liberate others.
        To oppress others.
        To keep the status quo.
        To upset the status quo.


    d4 - When Will I Give Up?
        As soon as I meet a serious setback or if I, or anyone else gets hurt.
        As soon as there are a lot of obstacles, or if I, or anyone else gets seriously hurt.
        As soon as someone dies.
        Never. I will die before I give up.

Omens
    Setting
        You find yourself on a ship at night with rain pelting your face.
        You find yourself in a seemingly peaceful grove full of flowers.
        You find yourself at the top of a wizard's tower, looking over the ledge.
        You find yourself sitting at a the bar of a familiar inn.
        You find yourself face down in the sand with no structure in sight.
        You find yourself falling from the sky and crashing into a body of water.
        You find yourself on a battlefield lined with dead soldiers and common folk alike.
        You find yourself in a cemetery covering all sides of a city-sized sphere floating in the darkness.
        You find yourself as small as an insect, lost in the grass of a field.
        You find yourself looking down upon your own body, laying where you slept this night.
        You find yourself feasting with loved ones in a grand mansion.
        You find yourself bound to a strangers back as they walk through a swamp.
        You find yourself rising from slumber in the same spot you fell asleep, but you see your body still sleeping; you are a spirit.
        You find yourself losing an arm wrestling contest to a king, and the court laughs and points.
        You find yourself swimming in an endless ocean.
        You find yourself telling a joke to a monarch, and nobody laughs.
        You find yourself furiously running from something chasing you.
        You find yourself aboard a ship far out to sea.
        You find yourself at the gates of eternity; a choir of divine beings float around you as far as you can see.
        You find yourself in the dilapidated temple of a religion you despise. However, a feeling of failure weighs heavy on your mind.

    The being
        A three-headed being looks down upon you from the sky, one face scowling, one crying, and one smiling.
        Your deity manifests in front of you after crashing down from the heavens; they are worn from battle.
        A serpent slithers toward you, it's body growing longer as it moves as to never leaves an area it once occupied.
        A sickly frog uses its broken limbs to move toward you.
        A figure made solely of familiar faces stares at you.
        The person you care for most walks up behind you and places their hands gently around your neck.
        Bones rise and form the skeleton of an unrecognizable creature.
        Your skin tears from your muscle, forming a swirl of a face in front of you.
        A swarm of maggots overtake your surroundings becoming a being standing 20 feet tall.
        A mass of red clouds shroud the sky. A tear allows you to see something approaching from far beyond the stars.
        Four versions of you appear, each one from an important moment in your life.
        An oval eye nearly as tall as you stares at you, following you wherever you go.

    Action
        The being looks left quickly, and scrambles around before disappearing, but you can faintly make out
        It creates a plume of fire; you feel the heat against your face. A vision of what to come:
        A pool forms at your feet, swirling with otherworldly power, which glistens with the image of
        It calls out your name but its voice fades from existence. Then you see
        It tears open, revealing a single word in a language you do not understand along with the image of
        You destroy it, but it wails and dies revealing
        A wave of teeth and bones wash everything away, and in its wake, you see
        It kneels before you, arms stretched out as if waiting to receive something.
        Its mouth opens, a haunting chorus of laughter erupting forth; its cackles turn to streams of light which manifest as
        It splits the ground open before you, exposing the depths of the world.

    Omen
        your hometown, burning, absolutely orange with smoke and flame.
        those you love turning the back on you, shame is clear in their eyes.
        a devilish form laughing before being consumed in brimstone.
        your eyes pull themselves from your body, moving toward a collection of colors you cannot look away from.
        all material items you treasure are taken, destroyed, or dissolve.
        a foreign vessel with a crew that have no solid form sinking at an incredible rate.
        cracks forming along the sea bed, draining the waters, and then a horde of monstrous limbs climbing out.
        a terrible screech and then complete and utter silence.

    Feeling in Dream
        You feel a great sense of dread about how real it all felt, but shake it off quickly.
        You feel a bit perplexed on why this being came to you of all people.
        You feel like this is something you need to tell your party members, but can barely find the words to describe the experience.
        You feel like this matter will weigh on you for the days to come.
        You feel the matter would be a complete waste of time to investigate.
        You feel unsettled at the events that unfolded before you.

    Feeling upon Waking
        You awaken in a cold sweat.
        When you awake, you find yourself sleepwalking about 20 feet from where you fell asleep.
        When you awaken, you still see the last image of your dream when you shut your eyes until you flush them with water.
        You jump up, screaming for a moment, but you are able to silence yourself before waking your allies.

Seperate, complete omens
    A PC makes eye contact with a mysterious beggar, who gasps and runs away. If followed, they disappear.
    A raven caws angrily at the party before flying away. More are seen periodically, perching and watching.
    A woman in the street drops an urn, which shatters. There's a moment of silence in the street.
    A baby won't stop crying in a nearby basket. If the players investigate, there is no child. The crying is gone.
    The campfire goes out in the middle of the night. There is no wind. It is difficult to restart as darkness closes in.
    The flames of nearby candles flicker out completely, but a moment later they return.
    The moon is larger and brighter than usual. It seems to dominate the sky, and cast harsh, pale shadows.
    A wooden road sign is snapped in half at a crossroads. It lies broken in the dirt.
    The clouds are gray and full of rain. And yet it does not rain. Though thunder rumbles, not a drop lands.
    A PC wakes up in the morning with a cut across their palm that wasn't there before.
    Animals go wild. Horses buck and have wide, scared eyes. Dogs bark fiercely and pull at their leashes.
    There's a large crack in a PC's drinking glass, and yet it doesn't break unless forced.
    A bird flies into the wall of a building and drops dead outside the door.
    A PC is contacted by the Sending spell, but they only hear heavy breathing and crying.
    The players hear distant, sourceless harp music. When pointed out or mentioned, it stops.
    An old man has a heart attack in the street. He stares directly at one of the PCs as he dies.
    A passed out drunk wakes suddenly and screams, clawing at his eyes. He runs and disappears.
    A strong wind that was blowing all day suddenly stops. The world is still for a few moments before life continues.
    A child chases an errant ball, only to trip and twist their ankle. The ball is not found.
    The temple doors are tossed open by a violent wind until a concerned acolyte rushes to close them.
        
Rumor 
    Did you hear the news?
    A Child
    A Fat merchant
    A Temple priest
    A Sailor
    A Soldier
    A Magician
    A Noble
    A Rogue
    A Crazy monk
    A Drunken farmer

    1d10 AND THEY
    Got drunk
    Got washed out to sea
    Got stuck on a runaway horse
    Found an old well
    Disappeared for 3 days
    Found an old tomb
    Met a weird stranger
    Found a magic item
    Were sleepwalking
    Walked off into the forest

    1d10 AND DISCOVERED
    A new disease
    A powerful artifact
    A cursed item
    A sleeping monster
    A treasure map
    A hero/villain thought dead, returned to life
    A book of secrets
    A key to a vast fortune
    A supressed truth about the ruling kingdom
    A door to another Plane

    1d10 AND NOW
    People are disappearing!
    People are sick!
    The king has decreed strange new laws!
    The temple has issued strange new tenets!
    The sun might not come back up!
    The moon might fracture!
    The world might be invaded!
    People are having bad dreams every night!
    People are unable to sleep!
    People are afraid to come outside!

Nightmares
    You find yourself stranded in a desert, only sand from horizon to horizon. You keep walking but the dunes don't seem to come any closer. You feel extremely thirsty and slowly but steadily, your energy starts to fade. Hours seem to pass and when youre getting desperate, the sand in front of you starts to shift, a giant scorpion emerges and starts chasing you. 
    You stand before all those who have been affected by your rampant killings throughout your adventure. A wife who committed suicide after you killed her husband, a bandit. A son, clinging to his mother and asking when his father will be home. A woman, weeping for the loss of her daughter. A man brought to tears by the loss of his husband. They weep and ask why you've brought them such pain. You cannot see yourself and it is unclear whether they are actually referring to you or to the cursed item which is giving the dream. 
    You're having a normal dream and everything is 100% fine, then all of a sudden, certain items start to grow, then shrink, then grow, then shrink. You have no control of what it is or if it grows or shrinks and your forced to be 100% concentrated on this object. You're completely aware you're dreaming but can't stop. Whilst this is happening, a loud, deep bass drum is going off every couple seconds, it almost sounds like a war drum. You can hear it but you can't comprehend what is going on or where it's coming from. 
    You dream about $the next encounter$. 
    You are fighting a shadow rival, and the nightmare is different dependent on where you are sleeping: In the mountains, your rival attacks with a sword of ice and rock; In the forest, your rival strikes from shadows and bushes all around; In the desert, your rival attacks with a scorpion's tail; In a town, every passing villager is your rival; By the sea, your rival pins you underwater, gasping for air; Just before you awaken soaked in sweat, your shadow rival's face lightens to reveal your own reflection. 
    You're in a dimly lit room, you see a butterfly or moth struggling to fly and flapping against the wall. Walking over to investigate, you reach out to gently touch the grey creature, only for it to fall into dust as soon as you touch it. 
    You dream that you are chased by countless slow walking zombies and you can't defend yourself even if you want to. Also the floor is very slippery, like you are on a frozen lake, no matter how hard you try, you can't run properly. 
    You dream that the letter you were searching for a long time is in your hands now, but you can't read it, but everybody expects you to read it. You want to take your time but it gets worse and the letter begins to burn in your hands. You have a little time to read this important information, good luck trying. 
    You dream that you are a constant state of falling. Everytime you think that you are going to hit the floor, a gigantic monster appears and swallows you to another dimension and you keep falling in there too. 
    You find yourself in a battle for whatever cause you champion, whether it be the safety of a loved one or the annihilation of your most despised enemies. The battle is a crucial one, one you’ve prepared for for months; however, every strike you make falls short, your body feels sluggish whenever you move to attack - as if you’re wearing full plate underwater or you’re one of those squishy wizard-folk - all your spells fizzle and drown as you find yourself unable to speak. You watch helplessly as you fail to protect your loved ones from horrible fates, your empire crumbles around you, and your every last pleasant dream lies in shambles at your feet. 
    You dream that you've lost all of the skill and experience you've gained over your travels. If you were a melee user, you feel your muscles wither away and your attacks are as weak as a child, a magic user, your spells backfire or are weak and useless, an archer would watch his arrows fly wildly off-target, etc. You can get creative with the description here, if a PC is proud of a certain skill you could describe in brutal detail how awful they've become. 
    You dream that your body is overtaken by a malicious presence, and you watch as a helpless captor while it slays your companions using your body 
    You dream that you've died, and your companions forget about you completely. Meanwhile, you linger on as a spirit and watch your party go on without you and meet great success, seemingly much better without you dragging them down. 
    In your dream you suffer a grave wound, and instead of saving you, your party decides to put you out of your misery, you spring awake just as you feel the cold steel of the blade meet your neck. 
    You go out for a night on the town with your friends. All is well and you are having a great time. Eventually the inevitable time comes when you must rest. Finally alone, the faint music and noise of the tavern behind you, you feel relaxed and at ease. Strangely relaxed, even as a hand morphs out of the wall in front of you. It gives a slow wave, so you feel like it is friendly and even wave back. Strange, when did it get a friend? Why do they keep trying to touch you? You decide to leave and try to turn away but there are more hands beside you now and they grab you. No matter how hard you try, you cannot break free, more and more of them grab at you, pulling you towards the wall. You manage to get out loudly as they somehow pull you into it, but you are cut off as a hand covers your mouth and pulls you through the wall. You see your friends rush into the room and bite the hand and try to shout to them, but they cannot hear or see you from this side of the wall. You watch them search for you fruitlessly until you are pulled screaming further into darkness. 
    You dream that you wake up normally, however as soon as you speak for the first time, you are interrupted mid sentence by biting your own tongue. You try to curse the pain away only to spit blood and teeth from your mouth. Frantically you scramble to grab them with one hand while trying to stop the flow of blood from your mouth with the other. You can feel more of your teeth falling from your gums into the sea of blood filling your mouth. Strangely, the person you were talking to does not seem shocked by this and continues on normally. You try to shout to them for help, hell, for anything, even a bowl to catch the pieces of you falling off, but only succeed in spraying them with a mouthful of blood and your remaining teeth. They still seem unphased, even as you raise your hands to your mouth in surprise to feel it, only to have your lower jaw slough off. Panicking you reach for them, only to find that your limbs crumple at the joints as you try to move them. Your entire body slowly crumpled as bits break or fall off until you are nothing more than a blob of mangled human parts in disarray, staring up at your friend as breathing becomes harder and harder to do. You wake up just after you black out. 
    You are awakened by strange noises outside. Some sort of loud commotion. You decide to get ready and investigate. As you head out, you are stopped by someone close to you. They start trying to tell you something. By the way their hands move, it must be important, but only an inhuman screeching comes out of their mouth when they talk. Their lips don't even move. You try to get them to repeat themselves and they seem to get frustrated and grab a notepad. You feel a slight relief for a moment before they turn the pad to you so you can see what they have wrote and it is just jagged scribbles. Others try to help them explain what's going on to you and progressively everyone gets more and more frustrated but you still can't understand them. You wake up screaming as one of your party members jumps on in a rage after an extended effort trying to get the point across to you. 
    You find yourself seemingly restrained, looking down you see your a baby swaddled in a course blanket. An unseen figure picks you up and begins to carry you, walking at a slow hobbled giant. Eventually you are laid down on a forest floor and the unseen figure walks away. A rat scampers over to you and climbs on your chest, you feel yourself smiling at it, soon there are more, 3, 6, a dozen, two dozen! They climb over biting into your flesh until you succumb to death from a 1000 bites. 
    You’re racing away from a darkness that threatens to swallow you. Something about this darkness and it’s inky blackness seems to be erasing everything it touches and the daylight begins to dwindle. You claw a slide down the edge of a wet leafy steep and slip into the pond far below. You expect cool water to wash over you but it’s oddly warm. You breech the surface and are horrified to discover you’re swimming in a pool of vomit. It’s in your mouth and nose, choking you as you start to drown, gagging over and over. Finally you realize that you are laying down, and the gagging is real, that you are actually beginning to choke on your own vomit. The character continues gagging afterwards for 15 minutes. 
    You're walking along a path when a heavy silence falls, like a great weight is placed on you. You look up to a forest in flames as large monstrous heads on necks higher than trees glare down upon you. 
    You slowly wipe the tears from your eyes before opening them. All around you the crowd shouts. 'You are a terrible person.' 'You should never have existed.' 'Scum of the earth.' Wiping more tears from your eyes you slowly turn your head upwards. Before you, silhouetted by the gray cloudy sky, stands a tree with a rope hanging from it. A hooded figure places a platform beneath it. A person is pushed towards it. You wish you could forget them but you can't. It's your partner of over 300 of your most beautiful, wonderful, joyful moons. The crowd's shouting gets louder. 'Murderer.' 'Terrorist.' 'Villain.' You continue to watch, knowing they are innocent with all of your heart, mind, and soul. The shouting gets louder. Your world is consumed, leaving only the shouting, the rope, and the love of your life. The shouting reaches its peak as the rope is tied around their neck. You can't take it any more. Rushing forward towards the tree, crying out in agony all the way. You push aside a guard and feel cold, hard steel piece through your back. A lung ruptures, but before you die you hear one last thing, 'You could have lived. It only had to be me.' Darkness fills your vision as the rope goes taut. 
    The weight of a cask of ale presses down upon your back as you return to your home village from the city. Birds sing as they fly through the sky's bright, cloudless blue. You set down the cask for a rest and begin to play a joyful tune on your ukulele. Gray clouds begin rise over the horizon but they don't look quite normal. After some thought you realize that it is smoke coming up from the only place you've ever known. The birds go silent as you leave the cask behind and start running. The cries of your people blend with screams of the invaders before echoing across the landscape. Praying to all of the gods, you continue only to run face to face with a strange person clad in dark armor and wielding a shining sword. Past them you can see your parents on the ground crying over the body of your sibling. Your childhood friend sees you and shouts to run while you can. The attacker grabs you and kicks you to the ground. Another one approaches and begins to mock you. You wish you could do something to stop this. You would willing surrender your life to end the suffering of your people. But that chance never comes, a sword pierces through your heart and you fall to the ground. The last sounds you hear are the cries of your parents and the angry shouts of your friend. Your vision fills with red before fading to black. 
    The bustling crowds push past you as you walk to your favorite bar. Once you arrive at your normal seat an unfamiliar dwarf comes up to you and sits down. 'I have an opportunity for you.' Intrigued you start paying very close attention. The dwarf pulls out a rune covered deck of cards, 'How many do you want.' After some questioning they explain that the cards are items of great power. You agree to take third cards and pull out the first one. On the first card a bright, golden, almost glowing orb appears. Years of experience flood through your mind while a belt wraps itself around you causing strength to surge through your body. Extremely satisfied with the outcome you pull out one more. On this card a the image of a golden key glows before a powerful magic $Important Item$ appears in your grasp. You can sense the sword or whatever] would strip away the soul of anyone unfortunate enough to get hit by you. The third card has a cloaked figure on it and no apparent effect occurs. You try to thank the dwarf but find they have already left. After celebrating by getting thoroughly drunk you return to your home and pass out almost as soon as you enter. You awake to find your spouse standing over you and bring down your new sword or bring down a sword whilst wearing your new whatever] on your throat. The air escapes your lungs and you hear nothing from them before your vision fades to dark. 
    A small sidewalk cafe in the open market. The character is seated and finds the body feels so heavy As to be unable to rise. Waiters and then passersby stop one after the other in front of the player placing plates full of offal in front of them. Disgust colors their faces as they take the plate away empty. The character doesn't remember eating but feels fuller and fuller. The crowds begin cutting of their own body parts to set before the player only to react in fear and loathing as empty plates are taken away. If the player ever tries to actually eat what is front of them they look down and see their own half eaten body and blood on their hands. 
    Climbing up the circular interior stairway of a tower castle the sense of something BAD following increases. The faster the character tries to get away the tighter and tighter the hall becomes until the press is suffocating. If the player turns around they find the stairs crumbling behind them into a void where they would fall forever. 
    A giant approaches and you reach for you weapon only to find an empty sheath. The creature laugh as it points out you forgot your pants as well. The rest of the party starts to chuckle also until one then the other notices that (whomever of the party the character likes most) has been slain with the lost weapon. 
    You are a Shepard, tending to your flock of sheep. You feel relaxed as you count them jumping over a fence, one by one. But pretty soon the sheep coming over the fence becomes a flood as they swarm around you. Soon you are completely surround, tormented by their inhuman moans as they stare at you with their alien eyes. 
    you dream that you are drowning in ghostly hands that pull you into the ground while the item floats before you 
    you dream a friend gives you a gift in a box and when you open it, the item lies inside and when you look back at your friend they are swiftly withering into a corpse 
    you dream of walking through a large empty house at night and tormented voices call to you behind closed doors but never anyone behind them 
    you dream you're standing at the banks of an icy lake at night and you can hear the item call your name over and over, knowing it lies at the bottom of the lake while silent figures around from the bank point at you, their eyes milky white 
    you dream that you visit a royal figurehead but when you are left alone with them, they begin to choke on blood in their mouth and the guards enter, convinced that you are the murderer 
    You're in an outhouse, when something big starts slamming on the door, trying to break it down. The slamming slowly gets louder, and you try to get up to escape, but you find yourself chained to the seat. The banging suddenly stops. The door creaks open and you hear a rasping breath, a cold chill engulfs you. You hear the breath get louder and louder, until it feels like it's almost in your ear. Then suddenly, the thing screams in your ear and you wake up in a cold sweat, screaming. 
    A little child stands before you. They reach out a hand towards you as if for help. An ax appears nested in their skull. A spear appears through their heart. They screams as blade after blade impale them; crying out for you to end it; end their misery. A small obsidian glass dagger appears in your hand. But you can’t do it. You wake up with a start, sweating, with the dagger clutched in your fist. 
    You are writing a letter or playing an instrument at a feverish pace, but your fingers start to quickly grow weak and you lose sensation in them. The skin and muscles on your fingers slowly starts to rot off the bone, but you cant stop moving them until the bare bone that remains falls off and you are left with only a bleeding stump for a hand. 
    You have a ship to catch. It leaves in just a few minutes and it is absolutely imperative you get on it. But for every few steps you take, the road shifts so that it goes at right angles to the path to the ship, and it lengthens. You keep going faster and faster, but cannot catch up. Periodically, you come upon people who ask you questions, and you have to give the right answer to move on, or something terrible will happen. 
    Your party is is the entrance to the $BBEG'S_LAIR$. Your comrade says 'On three. 1...2...' You glance down. You are naked, directly under the continual light globe in the ceiling, forgot to prepare any spells this morning and are not proficient in the bizarre exotic weapon in your hand. Your friends look at you expectantly to lead the charge. ... '3!!!!!' 
    You go about your day as usual, when you suddenly feel your teeth loosening as you touch them with your tongue. They start to fall out one by one, and you can't do anything against it.
    You find yourself sitting at a table in a dark room along with others, trapped in an hypnotic state and mumbling sentences while referring to yourself in third-person. 
    The dream is wonderful. All of your friends and family are there. Even the ones who have passed away. You feel elated and joyful. Everyone lives forever in the light. Then, slowly you realise that this can’t be real. People do die. Most of these people are dead. You will die too. 
    You are traveling a road by your self. The road begins to wrap around and suddenly you realize you're traveling in a circle you can't escape from. No where to go but forward you encounter someone traveling ahead of you on the same direction . As you catch up to him/her you they began to seem familiar. As you get close enough, you see it is yourself, only horribly disfigured. A gaping wound in your chest. And your face horribly scarred. This future version of you gasping for air says 'don't trust them' and falls over. 
    you are fighting with your closest friends against a horrible monster (beholder or something similar) when you are suddenly compelled to turn against those who have saved you countless times and whom you have grown to love and trust. you slowly kill them before killing yourself out of grief. 
    You are running from a horrifying monster the likes of which you've never seen before. He moves at a slower pace than you but he never seems to tire while you feel yourself fading quickly. Up ahead you see a house. Safety! Surely, if you get inside and lock the door you can buy time to find a hiding place. Your speed picks up, energy renewed at the thought of safety. Finally making it you slam open the door and dart inside. You survey your surroundings when suddenly you feel a hot breath on your neck. In that instant one terrible thought makes itself horribly clear. 'I forgot to lock the door.' 
    You dream you are staring into a mirror, your reflection smiles evilly at you before turning its back to you and walking away. The world surrounding you starts turning to glass and crystal, as your body turns to glass you awake. 
    A giant crystallized skull floats in space surrounded by stars, as the skull rotates to face you you catch a glimpse of light shining from inside the skull through one of its eye sockets. 
    You are sitting with your friends at a table in a tavern, having a meal when suddenly you find yourself bringing up a secret you hide from them. Then closest or more vulnerable friend]'s head rolls off. The severed head says 'no wonder you hid this, you monster.' You look down, your meal has turned to blood. You look back up. All your friends have lost their heads now, and they lay slumped over the table. 
    You are trapped in a giant butler's sink in dirty water and the plug has been removed and the water is beginning to swirl pulling you round and down sweeping you past giant utensils just too distant or too fast to catch. 
    You are nothing more than an imaginary puppet dancing to the tune of laughing godlike beings who decide your fate with a casual toss of dice. 
    Your party have forgotten you exist, and are trying to kill you or they torture you instead 
    You dream of getting stitches from a huge living orange with an artificer's crank-powered sewing machine... 
    You start by entering a room. There's a chest. It's a mimic. You run and open a door. It's a mimic. You bring out your sword. It's a mimic. The room is a mimic. Your chestplate is a mimic. Your helmet is a mimic. YOU are a mimic. 
    You’re wandering alone in a forest. It’s dark and cold, but there’s no snow, just a bitter frost that clings to everything. You can feel the numbness in your fingertips slowly spread up your hands and arms. You vaguely understand that you won’t last long - that you WILL die if you don’t find shelter from the cold. Up ahead you see a light. Maybe an inn? Just a small cottage? At this point anything will do. You try to walk towards it, but you can’t control your shivering and you collapse on the forest floor. You can’t move your fingers, but you can claw your way forward, inch by inch. Finally, you’re at the edge of the clearing, but you’ve used the last of your strength. The cold binds your screams in your throat, and your body shakes uncontrollably. Eventually even that ceases, and all you can do is watch the people through the windows as the frost covers your eyes. As you struggle to hang on to your last breath, knowing that once you breathe out no more air will enter your lungs, you wake and realize your chest hurts from holding your breath. 
    You sit next to a campfire. The party members surround you. You all tell stories, recite poems and jokes, and drink to your hearts content. Eerily, you hear a soft whisper in your ear, and you feel a sharp blade crawl across your neck. You watch in horror as your closest friends observe you bleeding to death and do nothing to help you. 
    In a bustling city you watch you party members getting slowly eaten by giant $Terrifying_Creature$. None of the citizens around you seem to hear you or do anything about it. 
    You find yourself laying down in a heap of snow in a frozen forest, barely alive, your friends are around you... (they are either all laying down, all standing, all dead, etc) 
    You find yourself at home, in the night outside your house. A terrifying attacker chases you inside, only to find your family/friends who are too busy to even take notice. You fall victim to the attacker as they sit idly by, ignoring your screams. 
    You find yourself among a crowded urban area, a market perhaps. However, you quickly realize everything, from folk to beast to nature itself, is running backwards in time. You try to interact with someone, to no avail. Suddenly you notice a hooded figure across the street staring at you. As you try to discern it's shape, you see a humanoid creature with an upside down face, screeching as it points in your direction 
    You and your companions are having a meal. Only thing is, there's no food, only charcoal on the plates. You turn it away, but everybody is staring at you seriously. You feel a hit on the back of your skull and dizzily watches without reacting your friends tying you to the chair and force-feeding you. It tastes like ash and you feel your throat bleeding as you swallow. 'You gotta eat, $Name$' 'Gotta keep your fire lit'. 
    You stand at the end of a large stone and wood bridge, the land around you dead and barren, the sky dark aglow with an eerie orange light. The wind howling as you scan around, you notice the bridge and the surrounding area as place from your childhood. Though then it was vibrant and lush with life thriving all around. As sadness and despair begin to settle into your gut you hear a ferocious wicked growl. From the shadows a large beast with razor sharp teeth, gnarled spines growing out of it's back, and blood thirty eyes starts moving towards. You try and runaway but move slowly as the horror approaches, half way across the bridge you stand consumed in shadow. The beast is upon you and ready to... 
    You are walking on the docks at night with your? child, you look to your left and a massive serpent made of black bones slowly rises from the dark water. You freeze but your? child keeps moving, playfully running forward. You wake up as the serpent lunges at your child?. 
    It's winter, you're a wolf running with your pack. They find something to eat in the snow and you join them. After a few bites you look down, you've been eating the half frozen remains of your loved one. 
    A $Charming_Friendly_Creature$ offers you blueberry cake. You eat the cake, and begin to expand and turn blue. Then your adventuring comrade yells 'Gonna Pop!' and everyone ducks for cover! 
    You wake up in your camp and hear the soft crunching of branches. As you look, you hear a growl behind you. As you turn to face it, a $Terrifying_Creature$ leaps at you. You feel warm breath on your face as it begins to take a bite! 
    You're hunting for an offender, and as you are about to shoot, they hide behind the last tavernkeep you saw. You shot them instead and the offender's shadow looms over you. Smothering you! 
    You're on a sandy beach and realize $Skittering_Creatures$ are crawling all over you. They engulf you completely. 
    You find yourself at a gathering of those you admire. Great heroes, beautiful lovers, and influential figures. They're all looking at you with admiration. You open your mouth to speak, but you feel your teeth begin to fall out. As each one clinks to the stone floor, you can feel the disgust roll over you, the taste of blood in your mouth making you sick as you wake up gagging. 
    You see (npc or character they're most attached to) approaching, as you go to embrace them you notice a look of surprise then pain cross their face, as you look down you see your hand, scarlet, as the blood drips down your elbow the drops in the pool of blood bring you back to awareness, they whisper one word 'Why?' as the tears run down their face mixing with the blood the last thing you hear is the dripping of the blood flowing down your arm. You awaken to the sound of the rains last drops collecting in a pool nearby. 
    You move to awaken $party_member$ for their turn on watch, but as you move you notice an odd weakness in your legs, as you look down you notice for the first time the flesh on your hands slowly melting and sloughing off revealing the pitted/ rotted bone beneath, as you go to scream out in horror/pain,your legs give out from beneath you, the impact knocking the breath from your lungs. As you lay there feeling your body slowly dissolve, unable to draw breath you see a pair of malevolent feline eyes staring at you from the lowest branch in the tree you were resting against, the cat begins to take shape and as it leaps at you it bursts apart as a swarm of spiders engulfing you, you awaken to your own screams, realizing it was just a dream, but a prickling along your spine and the echoes of a malicious laugh leave you wondering, was it really only a dream? 
    It's hot. Humid. You're holding an unfamiliar crossbow-like weapon. You lie motionless in a row of bushes along the edge of a flooded grain field. Dragonfly-shaped airships circle overhead with a powerful thumping sound, and begin to debark men clad in green. With a stuttering roar, some kind of automated wand sprays red magic missiles into the green-clad men from somewhere on your left. Their crossbow-like weapons glow with flickering star-shaped flame as they respond. You wake with a start, wondering what that even was. 
    You are being pursued by an immense fat demon made of glass. You can only run, because if you try to hide, it bursts through even the stoutest stone wall with a cry of 'OH YEAH!' Brilliant red ichor sloshes visibly within its skin at every step. 
    The party is ambushed by goblins. Just as you are about to enter the fray, you feel a breeze. One of your party members asks if you're forgetting something. You look down and see that you are nude. The party laughs. The goblins laugh. You wake up cold, the blanket having slid off the bed. 
    An airship envelops you in golden light and you float up from the ground. A group of hairless gray Deep Gnomes straps you to a table and performs a thorough examination. Uncomfortably thorough. They shine a glittering light in your eyes and you jerk awake. It's an hour before dawn and you can't recall making camp last night, even though the tents are set up. 
    You are standing above the sky, leaning against a wall of glass, looking down on the familiar coastline of your homeland, made strange by this new perspective. A menacing shape, clearly made of metal, slides soundlessly into view and begins to project beams of light at the points you know hold towns. 
    You're in complete agony. You move the hand away from your mouth to see it is covered in blood. The blood continues to drip on the sides of your mouth. You run to the nearby commoners walking among the streets begging for help except nothing you say makes sense. The words appear to be gurgled by the amount of blood. They look at you strangely and push you away as you bleed on their clothing. Looking into a mirror placed in front of a store, you use your hands to spread your mouth open and realize that your tongue has been extracted. The amount of blood begins to overtake you and you begin to choke. It is at that moment you wake up with a burning sensation in the back of your throat. You were choking on saliva in your sleep. 
    The bed you are sleeping in is really a mimic and is trying to eat you! 
    Your loved one is secretly a doppelganger and your real loved one is held captive far away. 
    Your favorite possession has been stolen and been replaced by a fake replica. 
    You're stuck in a white room with an eerie-looking statue. You don't know why, but something's telling you that you really need to leave or something horrible will happen. 
    You're stuck in some kind of time-loop, reliving the same day over and over again. Nobody will believe you, even as you predict every detail you've spent the last month or so seeing over and over. 
    A surreal rendition of $next_planned_encounter$. It takes a sharp deviation from the original when a shadowy creature picks the party off one by one and the dreamer is helpless to stop it. 
    You are stranded in a painted desert, and the sun is perpetually setting. The dry, dusty ground becomes a riverbed which flash floods and drags you under. 
    You are a bird, flying over someone dying. You alight next to them and they reach for you. 
    You are dying. A bird alights next to you. Then more. You are whisked up in a flock of small birds who peck and scratch. You know there will soon be no trace of you left, but you cannot.. or must not move. 
    A collection of live butterflies and winged insects sits in front of you, glittering like jewels. Your $Stern_Parental_Figure$ stands over your left shoulder instructing you in the method of euthanizing, and then mounting the insects for display and study. They tell you that you are not done despite all the bugs having been mounted. You realize they mean to have you mounted last, and expects you to do everything but the final pin. 
    Your teeth are loose. You pull one out by accident, but a second grows into it's place. You pull a second, and a third... 
    You see yourself in the mirror. You smile, and have too many teeth, and then your reflection drags you into the mirror and begins devouring you. 
    You go to show your friends some cool thing you can suddenly do, and find they are dead.. rotting hunks of flesh, but still moving. They bite and scratch, clawing at you, trying to drag you down. 
    You are lost and naked. Something is pursuing you, and the further you run the larger and more frightening it becomes, eventually looming on the horizon. 
    Wandering the labynthian corridors of a place you once knew well, seeking a murderer hiding amongst your friends. It starts to snow and inside the building there are snowdrifts everywhere. It is quite cold, and you are nearly naked. Your friends don't beleive you that there is a murderer and that it is snowing. You are also late, the murderer has killed one of your friends, and know that if you do not find the killer soon, then more of your friends will die. 
    A dream where you wandering through a cave populated with mannequins. All of whom are wearing the faces of your friends and family. At the back is a mannequin whose back is turned to you. You find yourself terrified at looking upon its face. But you don't know why... 
    You dream of your family members that are still alive are brutally murdered by someone or something. 
    Your beloved family pet turns on you, and you are forced in defense to choke it. It does not relent its attack as you do, and you're forced to continue choking until it dies. Its head swells and throbs with its heartbeat as you continue the hold, and it dies as the animal's scalp and face explode from the pressure of the blood you choked it with. Your pet falls dead from your hands, a brutal mess, and all the good memories you had with it flash before you and seem to crumble. 
    Your dream that you have severed ties with $best_friend$; yet contact continues, and they seem to be nearly everywhere in your life. They betrayed you, yet everywhere you go and everything you involve with they seems to be there. Frustrated, you approach them near a stream and berate them that it was they who wronged you and still goes where they know you will be. You begin to argue in earnest, screaming and furious, and as your vision blurs and tunnels, you find you have wrestled them to the bank of the stream, and to try to silence his screams, push his head in the water. Before you know it they are dead in your hands! 
    You are in a noble's salon, moving among salaciously dressed courtesans. Every drink you sip tastes like sand, and every caress fills you with horror. When you sit at the table they all set to, devouring the meat, but the sickly sweet smell of it makes you think of corrupted flesh, and the thought of eating it turns your guts. 
    You dream that you're in a dark room, and random body parts of all different races are appearing and disappearing sporadically. They begin striking you, chasing you, or assaulting you. Some have claws, others warts or a contagious disease...  
    You dream you're watching the stars when you feel a sense of losing your footing like you're going to fall into the night sky, nearly falling upward. As your feet leave the ground, the stars dim as a winged form stares at you, then you plummet into the cold ocean. 
    You dream that you're home reading by candlelight when you look up to see your $PET$ contorting; it's head and limbs sprouting second and third heads and limbs. Lightning flashes by the window and a dark monstrous shadow looms across the horizon line. 
    You dream you wake in your bed at home to the sound of the sound water flowing just out of ear shot. As you follow the sound you feel the wriggling of tentacles in your left hand and look down to see a writhing mess of small squid. 
    You dream that you are buried alive in the ground and waken to the cramped darkness, screaming & yelling as you scratch your nails bloody against the coffin lid. The ground outside is filled with burrowing and holes begin to smash open as black tentacles begin to writhe through slowly filling the coffin with their cold, slimy touches as they begin to suffocate you. 
    You dream of floating in a strange, airless void, with a scintillating blue field of stars on one side and a great black void on the other. As you look around, the void begins to grow, enveloping the rest of the sky, and as the last lights wink out you feel your body start to be ripped apart.

Rumors that can be quests
        The Giants were never killed in the giant war, they secretly retreated into their airship and escaped (they actually went up into the clouds like Jack and the beanstalk)
        The king's advisor is a disguised lizardfolk
        Lead helmets stop the government from hearing your thoughts (they also make you go crazy from lead poisoning)
        The public execution of an enemy kingdom's spy was faked with a body double. The real guy is hiding out pretending to be a peasant in one of the outlying towns.
        The birds are spies for the government (not robots though that's crazy)
        the beholder is rumored to have dreamt up the kingdom itself
        The Primordials were never content with being resigned to their own planet, and the increasing amount of dragonborns (only there by sudden portals) points to the fact theyre trying to break back in
        The heir to the throne is actually the son of the general, switched at birth with the true heir, who is living as a peasant, unaware of their lineage.
        The rapid disappearance of many types of animals in the surrounding area is the work of a mad wizard, intent on fusing them together Frankenstein style. It’s only a matter of time until they will go after humans.
        The government puts something in the city's water in order to surpress magical abilities in its citizens.
        The bandit raids on towns and villages are orchestrated by smithing guilds in order to increase demand in weapons and armor.
        The strange magical beasts and monsters in the area are actually what's left of sapient humanoids that were experimented upon by mad mages.
        The local artifact and curio shop is suspiciously cheap and easy to steal from to encourage the spread of demonicly corrupting artifacts.
        A being with glowing red eyes has been seen in the woods many times over the past month.
        The entire kingdom is actually being run by the sentient throne the king sits on
        The kingdom's elite are using the cargo Griffins to spread chemical trails across the sky.
        The local Crime Lord is actually the king's daughter who is trying to make life generally difficult for her father who has promised her hand in marriage against her desire, and eventually she's planning on having him murdered in order to take over. She keeps her identity completely secret and lives a double life with the denizens of the underworld.
        The real king was actually killed years ago by his corrupt advisors; he's been replaced by a doppelganger under the control of said advisors ever since.
        The Gods are a lie. They don't exist. They are really a powerful cabal of spellcasters who rule the world secretly
        Dragons aren't particularly long lived. They only appear so because they grow in power by killing others of their kind. That is why there are so few of them
        Dwarves are the actual builders of this world. They created everything literally from the ground up. Elves are actually 'fallen dwarves' who live so much longer because they have cut themselves off from the earth and stone and no longer return to it when they die.
        Everyone knows there used to be a village there, it was on the trading route. But there is no village there anymore. Nor any sign that one used to be there!
        The attacks on the livestock are not actually from a direwolf as the king has proclaimed, but they are being used as sacrifices by an evil cult OR your typical lycnathropy trope.
        Someone believes that the king was born abroad and isn't legitimate and wants witnesses or certificates of his birth
        Someone believes that Elven Pressleaf, the famous elven bard, didn’t actually die from too many nature shrooms, but retired and is in hiding
        Someone believes that teleportation magic is a hoax, and that people haven’t been to the The Lunar Castle, home of Lunadiel
        Carol O'Na, is believed to be the reincarnation of the horseman Pestilence. It seems everywhere she goes people get sick
        Karen Wokefeld once hired an abjuration wizard to protect their house during a small bandit raid. She is claiming his abjuration magic actually cursed her family, and would like him dead
        No one goes near the abandoned mansion at the edge of town because it’s haunted. But rumour is that’s just a ghost story to keep people away while something more sinister happens behind the walls..
        A local business man is intent on building a legacy of locally-owned farms. He employs only slaves.
        The rise in sea-levels over the past few decades are not a result of the slowly increasing global temperature but rather an increase in gargantuan water-dwelling creatures, whose sheer collective volume is actually displacing the water, making it appear to have risen.
        A local drunk and part time stable-hand claims the recent spate of illness and deaths across the kingdom are the result of tiny invisible creatures attacking us from the inside, and not because the king slept with the wife of a powerful and vindictive mage. Nobody believes him, and his drinking habit grows by the day. His family are concerned and are considering staging an intervention.
        All the random natural events impeding construction of an outpost are being caused by a group of druids trying to stop the project.
        The king is hiring spies to spy on people who didnt pay lots of stuff
        A person wanted forthe stuff of the kingdom is a little kid
        There was a shop that had over 40 people going there a week but it was replaced with one of the least selling shops today
        The kings king's assassination while he was in his coach was not by a rogue from the the storage tower of the wizards collegium, but was actually done by the kings own guard from a grassy hill on the route through the city.
        The leaders of the 2 warring nations are in cahoots. The gain profit and influence by perpetuating the war. They have provided propaganda to be taught in schools, they put out flier propaganda on both sides, they use religion.
        The kings throne is actually a mimic that has been enchanted to only allow those of the royal bloodline to sit on it.
        The Queen was never assassinated, it was actually the King. She has been using polymorph and potions to disguise herself as the King.
        The horses used by the guards are actually Kelpie that have been contracted to work for the Kingdom and are feed the prisoners that are 'executed'.
        The reason the Holts Farm never suffers from blights and pests is because they sacrifice an orphan to the creature that lives in their well.
        A rebel group is opposing the prominent church with the overwhelming evidence of their old god.
        When you use teleportation magic, it's not you being teleported. The real you dies, gets disintegrated, and then they make a clone of you in your place.
        Changelings and Doppelgangers have infiltrated our society, they could be anyone at any time!
        The King has been replaced with an illusion - The real king is being held prisoner in the dungeons.
        The thieves guild is actually a secret branch of the government - When someone gets caught, they don't get prosecuted, they get retired from the public eye and repurposed.
        Aarakocra aren't real.
        Secret organizations proliferate anti-tiefling propaganda to keep them subjugated.
        Orcs used to be intelligent, until government programs turned them into killing machines.
        The church of <insert god here> is a front for the cult of <insert other entity here>.
        Metallic dragons don't exist. Chromatic dragons paint themselves metallic to attract prey.
        The 'Common' language is a means of cultural suppression by humans for races who speak other languages - by unifying the races under the human tongue, they assured that they were at the center of trade. It didn't even used to be called common, that change was made in the year 733 for PR purposes.
        There are alligators the size of whales in the city sewers. One recently destroyed an outhouse!
        The earth is hollow; beneath the Underdark, there is a beautiful and mysterious land of freshwater seas and mushroom forests with inverted gravity.
        Roundearthers are convinced that the world is not a disc and stories of sailors falling over the edge are merely government propaganda.
        The 'Golden Age of Magic' that took place hundreds of years ago actually never took place. The world is much younger than history books show, and everything that happened before a certain point in time was a large-scale illusion placed upon everyone in the kingdom as a cover-up for something else that happenedinfernal
        A clan of changelings have secretly replaced significant individuals of power in order to steer the kingdom to its doom as revenge for somethinginfernal
        The kingdom is surrounded by tall walls that hide everything beyond. No one is allowed out because of the Great War between nations. In reality, there is no Great War. Beyond the walls are unending stretches of desert, ocean, and destroyed land due to some catastrophic event that's hidden from the general populace. But the truth is somewhere out thereinfernal
        Low magic campaign: Powerful magic exists, but the knowledge is hidden in the hands of the powerful, while the general populace is told that magic inherently has a cap in strengthinfernal
        A current plague is actually spread by mages using 'Sending' which is why the non-magic using commoners get illking
        According to some credible sources, health potions are made of pulverized gnomes.
        The various planes of reality are all part of a giant turtle’s dream. If a sufficiently powerful wizard or sorcerer were to find a way, they could wake the turtle.
        A bandit company that was vanquished/scatter years ago never really died, their members just integrated into society and they're enacting a covert, long-term mission to sow chaos in the kingdom. Rumor is, 'My neighbor is a sleeper agent of the long-disbanded thieve's guild!'
        If you go into the Giant's Beard Inn, Soggy Frog Inn, or Quail's Tavern and ask about Rohir Borgenaut, they kick you out. That name means nothing to anyone else in the city. Why?
        Those slaves that the mercenaries sold to the citizenry a few months back are actually just zombies wearing rings of disguise self! People are paying money to bring zombies into their home!
        I saw the court wizard flash a demonic handsign once, as he stood behind the Baron during an address to the people. Who was he trying to signal in the town? What does the signal mean?
        A farmer tells the party that his neighbor was NOT, in fact, killed by orcs three years ago. Orcs go house to house, killing and plundering. My neighbor was violently killed in his own home, and nothing was stolen! no other houses hit! I suspect it was the farmer's guild, they've been squeezing us really hard. I thought they were supposed to help us?!
        The humans in an elf-human city have invented a new device that the elves suspect was purposefully invented to hurt them: the printing press. Using this device, they began mass unlawful arrest of all elves caught in the human quarter, and are producing arrest records much faster than the elf council can keep up with - resulting in a great many innocent elves staying in jail unlawfully for days, weeks, and even months.
        Farmer Randall made a huge fuss a week ago - claims he saw a green dragon eating his sheep. He demanded a retinue of guards come and do a detail. When the guards arrived the following dawn, farmer Randall denies ever making any such claim, and refuses the guards entry to his farm. A few days later, his wife 'left town in the middle of the night' and no one has seen her since. What the hell is going on at farmer Randall's?
        Many demons and other humanoid monsters are just people wearing suits

Rumor mill
    prime
        The king.
        The queen.
        The local miller.
        The local blacksmith.
        A retired adventurer.
        A famous assassin.
        An influential guildmaster.
        The mayor.
        An up-and-coming young knight.
        The high priest of Bhaal.
        A powerful Drow Matron.
        A wicked wizard.
        The Knight-Lord of a local order of Paladins.
        Strahd von Zarovich.
        A militant emperor in the West.
        A dragon-tamer in the mountains.
        The local dragon.
        An Orc warlord.
        One of the party members.
        An ancient pharaoh.
        A popular gladiator.
        A teamster who is a local legend for reckless driving.
        The crown prince.
        A master alchemist.
        A high-ranking Hobgoblin commander.
        An elven sage.
        The duchess.
        The duke.
        The local priest.
        An eccentric inventor.
        The town lunatic.
        A notorious pirate captain.
        A travelling monk.
        A famous mystic.
        The housekeeper of a local hostel.
        A Viking king.
        The Great Chief of Ogres.
        A famous trap-maker.
        An influential politician.
        The town beggar.
        The Princess.
        A newly-appointed Lady Knight of the region.
        A newly-appointed Lord Knight of the region.
        The Caesar of Minotaurs.
        The local weaponsmith.
        The BBEG.
        The mysterious man with a long, silver beard and a ragged black cloak.
        The mysterious woman with long, silver hair and an old-fashioned scarlet cloak.
        The local tobacco merchant.
        The kingpin of a crime ring.
        The head of a Tarrasque-worshiping cult.
        A vicious Manticore baron.
        A highly sought-after tailor.
        A highly sough-after baker.
        A highly sought-after physician.
        Every gravedigger in the entire region.
        The king's two-year-old son.
        A kuo-toa diplomat.
        The Bloodlord of Vampires.
        A necromancer.
        The court magician.
        A boatman on the local river.
        A mason building the king's new palace.
        A great athlete.
        The head of a not-so-secret society.
        The local innkeeper.
        A zombie who was voted in as townmaster.
        An Elvish king.
        The Lord of a druidic circle.
        The new 8-year-old king.
        A famous painter.
        One of the PCs' mentor.
        A famous evangelist.
        A Gorgon beauty guru.
        The yuan-ti God-King.
        A powerful Unseelie Fey.
        A goblin warlord.
        The editor of a local newspaper.
        The game warden.
        The king's butler.
        A renowned golem-building wizard.
        A great General.
        A local veteran and war hero.
        A folk-music writer.
        The street-lamp lighter.
        The street sweeper.
        The chimney-sweep.
        The harsh boss of a local factory.
        A far-sailing explorer, back in town after an expedition.
        A local archaeologist.
        The Witchfinder General.
        The Protector Angel of the nearest large city.
        A powerful Seelie Fey.
        The Iron Emperor of Dwarves.
        The Erlking of a local band of monster-hunters.
        A fashion icon.
        The Grand Duke of the Society for the Preservation of Gnomish Vocabulistics and Grammar.
        A famous daredevil.
        The leader of a mostly harmless local cult.
        The leader of an extremely harmful local cult.

    mid
        Is disgusted by...
        Hates...
        Weeps tears of joy for...
        Breaks down laughing at the thought of...
        Is worryingly obsessed with...
        Spent all their money on...
        Has asked the Church to forbid...
        Has asked the Church to demand...
        Has formed a society based around...
        Has led an expedition to...
        Once enjoyed...
        Has recently picked up...
        Demands someone to explain to them what all the fuss is with...
        Has forbid the mere mention of...
        Commissioned several murals of...
        Sentenced convicts to....
        Named their new yacht....
        Disowned their child for the child's becoming addicted to...
        Is hopelessly addicted to...
        Has challenged any takers to a contest of...
        Has started a scandal by...
        Has completely ignored the issues of...
        Got drunk and admitted to...
        Firmly denies that they have ever...
        Is hosting a costume ball themed around...
        Suffers nightmares about...
        Wants advice on how to go about...
        Tossed someone out of a window for daring to malign...
        Hired bards to sing the praises of...
        Is trying to quit...
        Divorced their spouse to spend more time...
        Wandered into the desert with the intent of...
        Demanded that any honest man would never stoop to...
        Stole a carriage to go...
        Has paid people to stop...
        Has demanded, against ancient tradition, that they be allowed to...
        Carved a statue of themselves...
        Has never even tried...
        Is ignoring the obvious solution to their current problem, ....
        Gives up all hope for the world when they think about...
        Turns into a panda whenever they try...
        Has been cursed by a witch to ceaselessly wander through the forest, ...
        Loves their spouse, but more so, ...
        Used magic to make 100 people go...
        Got drunk and went...
        Spent all their inheritance on...
        Might start a war over...
        Tattooed themselves with scenes of...
        Ceaselessly talks about...
        Ran 40 miles so as not to be late for...
        Wears their finest clothes to...
        Believes in the Gods but more so in...
        Doesn't even understand...
        Pays good money for people to compete at ... for their amusement.
        Found an ancient urn, worth thousands, depicting...
        Insists that it is a genteel pursuit to...
        Is causing trouble for everyone by...
        Sees it as unseemly to...
        Frequently enjoys...
        Is enraged by...
        Is saddened by...
        Got sick while...
        Broke their foot while...
        Died while...
        Proposed to their true love whilst...
        Is terrified by the prospect of...
        Believes it is a grievous sin to...
        Nearly started a revolution while a nobleman was...
        Clapped a man in irons for trying to...
        Is only ever gladdened by...
        Fully intends to kill their rival, making it look like an accident that occurred while they were...
        Has changed their main pursuit to....
        Denies claims that they ever..., despite solid evidence.
        Has a long history in their family of...
        Was nearly assassinated while...
        Explodes with fury when others ask if they intend to...
        Is enchanted to slowly levitate into the sky should they ever try...
        Has ordered a local noble to stop...
        Is haunted by the ghosts of those who died such that they could...
        Has cured themselves of a terrible illness by simply...
        Arose from the grave when they heard their relatives were... instead of attending their funeral.
        Wrote long and vivid books on the subject of...
        Will not so much as get out of bed until they...
        Rises bright and early to...
        Trained several hawks for the purposes of...
        Breaks into song and dance randomly to distract people from their habit of...
        Says they would rather die than...
        Dreams of...
        Has no appetite on days when they haven't...
        Hired adventurers to...
        Hired a wizard to help them with...
        Built an entire facility dedicated to...
        Used slaves and prisoners for...
        Threw themselves into a lake after a long day of...
        Hosted a banquet in celebration of their successful quest of...
        Frequently boasts about how good they are at...
        Demands that nobody but themselves be allowed to...
        Prays to the gods for success in...
        Recommends that pregnant women try...
        irmly believes that .... is extremely classy and romantic.

    mid2
        Hunting ogres.
        Digging pit traps.
        Minting gold pieces.
        Falling out of windows.
        Human sacrifice.
        Setting things on fire.
        Raiding small settlements.
        Eating pastries shaped like sacred icons.
        Swimming around in pools of oil.
        Riding horses.
        Painting pictures.
        Sabotaging other people's carriages.
        Hurling radishes at beggars.
        Stepping on people's toes.
        Doing nothing.
        Shutting up.
        Feeling confident.
        Running over small and fluffy animals.
        Tipping over Dominoes.
        Going on shopping sprees.
        Punching sacks of potatoes.
        Building elaborate but useless siege engines.
        Having rap-battles with pixies.
        Doing the conga.
        Convincing other people to do the conga.
        Building extremely comfortable couches.
        Building up an immunity to every kind of poison they can find.
        Studying vaccination.
        Learning how to fly.
        Burying dead bodies.
        Juggling swords.
        Juggling.
        Being a clown.
        Buying elaborate tricorn hats.
        Ringing people's doorbells and running away.
        Writing terrible books.
        Reading scandalous magazines.
        Praising themselves.
        Cow-tipping.
        Throwing china plates across rooms.
        Plating things with solid gold.
        Getting involved in tangled love-triangles.
        Awarding themselves trophies for things they never did.
        Giving long and elaborate speeches.
        Getting drunk.
        Getting high.
        Throwing knives at pictures of their enemies.
        Mixing fake blood in excessive quantities.
        Fighting Treants.
        Inventing new kinds of forks.
        Grave robbing.
        Burning down mansions.
        Writing speeches full of innuendos for pastors.
        Recycling old furniture.
        Playing war-games.
        Playing card games.
        Playing dice games.
        Making loaded dice.
        Starting bar fights.
        Making theatrical declarations of war against nonexistent countries.
        Completely ignoring real-world geography.
        Crashing the economy.
        Hurling cinder-blocks at passerby.
        Teaching Trolls calligraphy.
        Insulting Dragons.
        Writing dramatic Last Wills for themselves regarding fictitious deaths.
        Murdering people to start a murder-investigation romantic drama.
        Brooding on rooftops.
        Doing tuck-and-rolls into wedding ceremonies.
        Hiding treasures in local dungeons.
        Doing the Charleston at funerals.
        Starting moshpits at children's cello recitals.
        Headbanging to the church choir.
        Rolling themselves down hills.
        Giving excessive amounts of charity.
        Joining every secret society they can find.
        Doing somersaults when excited.
        Shooting people with crossbows.
        Designing a new national flag for their country every day, and sending it to the nobility for approval.
        Taming Mimics.
        Hitting people over the head with bar stools.
        Wearing cool cloaks.
        Spontaneously combusting.
        Drag-racing in carriages.
        Trying to ride Displacer Beasts.
        Trying to ride Owlbears.
        Jumping out at people from behind corners and shouting 'Boo!'
        Rigging old castles to explode.
        Making silly faces at high-ranking clergy.
        Smoking far too many cigarettes than is advisable.
        Writing fake magazine articles describing wars between closely allied countries.
        Deep-frying books.
        Writing dictionaries of all 89 dialects of Abyssal.
        Pulling pranks.
        Breeding new horses.
        Conducting unethical scientific experiments.
        Building exact replicas of small villages, then demanding that all the villagers from that village move to the replica.
        Giving themselves ludicrous new titles.
        Carrying far too many canes.
        Carrying out exorcisms.

    finish ...I found that out through  
        The local newspaper.
        The village idiot.
        The gods themselves.
        A giant demon.
        A local magistrate.
        The police chief.
        A drunk in a bar.
        An eerily sober man in a bar.
        The local miser.
        My grandmother's ghost.
        An insane prophet.
        A mercenary captain.
        A mermaid.
        A man who turned out to be a Doppleganger.
        Three gnomes in a trench coat.
        Two halflings in a trench coat.
        Eighty-six pixies in a trench coat.
        An animated, sentient trench coat.
        A Beholder.
        A man cursed to only speak the truth.
        A local jester.
        A mafia hitman.
        A goblin who was on fire.
        A Cloud Giant.
        A group of Azers.
        A man who fell through the roof.
        A Viking warrior.
        A man who rolled through like tumbleweed.
        A Mind Flayer.
        Mordenkainen himself.
        Volo himself.
        A bounty hunter.
        An old soldier.
        An old policeman.
        A former army commander.
        A crusader.
        An occultist.
        A grave robber.
        A mailman.
        An animated reflection of myself in a mirror.
        A man who wore two dark cloaks.
        A one-legged, one-armed, one-eyed man.
        A werewolf.
        A stone golem.
        A tap-dancer.
        A saxophone player.
        The high priest of Kelemvor.
        An entire travelling circus.
        The town crier.
        A retired pirate.
        A retired bandit.
        A slightly insane author.
        A salty old sailor.
        A great-grandmother from a large local clan.
        The greatest clown in the world.
        A suit of Animated Armor that had trapped a man inside it.
        A man selling salt.
        A trickster spirit.
        An imp.
        A regiment of Hobgoblins.
        A tribe of Orcs.
        An Ettin, who also said it wasn't true.
        A Wraith.
        A lich lord.
        A lost traveler.
        The mayor's niece.
        A fisherman.
        A silent and mysterious stranger who recently moved into town.
        A professional spy.
        A stockbroker.
        A tabaxi minstrel.
        A Goliath monk.
        A band of singing Dwarves who sung it to me.
        An Elvish comedian.
        A halfling with a mohawk.
        My evil twin.
        A lost Planeswalker.
        A slightly evil magician.
        A poison dealer.
        A Mob legbreaker.
        Someone covered head to toe in scarves and coats.
        My spouse.
        My son.
        A Tortle with a purple-painted shell.
        Three knights, one in white armor, one in black, one in grey.
        A Kobold with a violent temper who screamed at me about it.
        A dragonborn who was looking for their parents.
        A beautiful forest nymph.
        An old woman who turned out to be a Hag.
        An old man who turned out to be a Vampire.
        A man who refused to stop doing jumping jacks.
        A young woman who started a dance party after telling me.
        A skeleton.
        A morbid man with tired-looking eyes and rumpled suit.
        A talking parrot.
        A wandering preacher.
        A young half-elf who was on a pilgrimage.
        A knight in golden armor.
        Gary Gygax.
        A talking cat.

Individuals
    Ancients
        The Swamp Lurker: a six foot tall elven woman with skin lesions and leprosy ulcers. The Swamp Lurker has been spotted in swamps all over the world and is always carrying a lantern. Legends say that she was once a cleric that was desperately trying to cure her city of a deadly disease. Those who make pacts with her have the strange quirk of attracting flies. She has been known to assist travelers as well as kill them.
        Corrin: an artificer that had achieved lichdom through human transmodifications. Corrin is now more machine than man.
        The Chained King: a large creature with black feathers and demon horns. The Chained King was punished by the gods for using forbidden magic. The Chained King now remains locked away by three chains, each will be broken if certain requirements are met. As of now one of the chains was broken when a woman gave birth to a beast.
        Fafnir: a 15 million year old red wyrm that has survived off of his unending list for gold. Fafnir uses his greed as motivation to remain forever living.
        Volk: a primordial living at the bottom of a volcano. Legends say when Volk arises from the volcano the entire continent will be lit aflame.
        Sobrick: a crocodile human hybrid often worshipped by lizardfolk who is said to spring from the bottom of the ocean depths to eat the sky when he escapes a maze of coral he is trapped in.
        Galia: The mother of all dryads, Galia is found in a forest in the feywild and is said to be 100-300 feet tall. Galia is responsible for creating seasonal change. If Galia dies she simply is reborn from her old corpse. Galia is lawful in nature and will only appear to those who she wishes to see.
        The Watcher: an invisible entity with eternal life grated to them by the gods of death. It’s impossible to know how old the watcher is or where they are at any moment but what is certain is they are always gathering information. Warlocks have made pacts with The Watcher but even they have never talked to or seen them.
        The Monolith: a monk that has been meditating for 2000 years. The Monoliths real name is Feng and he has not aged since he had been in meditation. The Monolith while being unconscious still has subconscious defenses. Many assassins have tried to kill The Monolith only to have their mind bombarded with psychic energy.
        William Greyhammer: a dwarven paladin that upon death was offered the opportunity to be the guardian of Celestia. William spends his days at the gates of Celesia making sure the people who enter are allowed there.
        Drakeslayer: a greatsword that was forged by a great cleric. Drakeslayer can speak telepathically and has a hatred for dragonkind. Drakeslayer is a +3 weapon and deals an additional 2d6 to all dragons.
        Behemoth: a 6 legged bear-like creature with chitinous plates and fur, a hairless head and sharp needle like teeth. Roaming the heart of the oldest forest in the land, its roar is audible from the villages near the edge. They say it sounds like the screams of thousands of creatures dying, and the war drums of a legion
        Goliath: a tiger-like creature with one pair of legs and a pair of muscular arms. It’s fur is thick and drips a dark viscous syrup. A head that looks almost reptilian in nature and thick sharp teeth like the heads of spears. It’s roar sounds like a screeching violin. On its stomach is a deep scar, scholars say the Goliath got this scar from a fight it survived with The Behemoth
        Spawn of Orcus: This entity is the result of an ancient summoning ritual gone wrong in the Underdark. 30ft in diameter, the Spawn of Orcus is an amalgamation of over a hundred humanoid corpses and skulls, fused together in a disgusting mutated formation of perpetually rotting flesh and bone. For centuries it has writhed in agony in a gigantic cavern known as the Sepulchre Sanguinis, where the original ritual once took place. Its agonizing wails can be heard for miles, and its only wish is it to spread pain and suffering to those who cross its path.
        Warforged Dragons: a peculiar species that was uncovered only recently. Warforged dragons are the rarest type of dragon and come in all forms of metals like copper, steel, iron, and even aluminum. The largest and most intelligent of the warforged dragons known is Gorashi. Gorashi breaths fire and poison, they have been known to make deals with mortals for knowledge they have gained in their lifetime.
        Barothgar: an orcish sorcerer that steals the remaining life force of the creature he kills. Barothgar has killed so many creatures that his estimated lifespan is 1.3 trillion years. Barothgar is a name feared by all orckin. Some old and sick orcs venture into his mountainous domain so that Barothgar can give them a warriors death.
        Phenrodna: A failed attempt at creating a being with the power of sorcery artificially, Phenrodna is sealed inside a large gemstone through the use of the Imprisonment spell, and has been for many hundreds of years. Originally a normal human, it has lost that humanity, the wild magic coursing through its veins mutating it into a mercurial form that is ever shifting, while also driving it insane, and making it exceptionally powerful. It can be released from imprisonment by three kings simultaneously touching the crystal.
        Karthonon: a lich that lives in the feywild and is worshiped by the fairies living near him. Karthonon uses his worshippers as subjects for his alchemichal experiments. Karthonon is as of now not very well known however many of the feywilds best divination wizards forsee of a dark being using his power to destroy the summer court. Whether the being succeeds is uncertain. The dark being these wizards see is Karthonon.
        The Weeping King: A ghostly apparition that resides in a lonely, decaying long hall in the wetlands. Tears seem to eternally flood from his eyes and his hellish wail drives men to their knees. When he holds aloft his chipped, rusted sword a host of long dead warriors manifest around him
        Kumbaka: a dragonborn bard that was one of the first dragonborn ever born into existence. Kumbaka spent his life learning as many instruments and languages as possible. One day using his charm and cunning Kumbaka made a bet to a god of magic that if they couldn't kill him before he was done with his preformance tomorrow was over then he would be unable to age and won't die until they are finished counting to infinity. The god of magic agrred to this bet with confidence but on the night of the performance Kumbaka was nowhere to be found. Kumbaka had actually preformed in a different plane of existence which bought him enough time to finish his preformance before he could be found. Kumbaka knows that the god is almost done counting to infinity amd is planning one last show three years from now. In his life Kumbaka had learned to play 13 instruments and can speak 6 different languages. Kumbaka is proud of his accomplishments and is ready to die.
        The Hermit of the Glade: No one knows how old he is, but he has always been there, and will always be there. His house is well maintained, though of low quality. For some reason no one ever bothers him, and few even bother to visit. He is always polite, helpful and could even be called friendly by those who have tried to visit. Perhaps he is some old man blessed/cursed with immortality, or perhaps there’s more to his story.
        The Beast: A boar that has lived in the underdark for 1000 years. He was ordinary boar that grew too large. Throughout the ages hunters have tried to slay The Beast, but none have triumphed. The Beast has only grown, both in size and hatred. His thick hide bristles with the spears and blades of the hunters and warriors it has bested.
        Früdwark The Elder Giant: no one is sure if Früdwark is a storm giant or a separate breed of giant entirely. Früdwark is by far the largest and oldest giant known to giant kind. Früdwark has no concern for other giants, dragons, or mortals and simply wants to be left alone. Früdwark has a distaste for dragons especially because dragons seem to be the creatures that are always trying to pester him the most. Früdwark has been known to make deals with mortals so that they can stop bothering him and so that they can kill dragons who bother him.
        Filtara: the oldest dracolich still alive. Filtara was the creature that had taught mortals to achieve lichdom at the cost of their servitude. Filtara was betrayed by her servants and was banished to an endless void somewhere in the shadowfell. When Filtara escapes her prison she will plan to make all humanoids extinct for what they have done to her.
        Ythandr: a pit fiend that owns the endless library which is a huge landmark in the nine layers of hell. The endless library is considered the library with the most books and information within its walls. Those who make too much noise in the library are swiftly dealt with by Ythandr. First time offenders are warned and left with a painful burn mark, second time offenders are taken to an area of the library simply labeled 'pain room'. It's a mystery what happens in the pain room but each offender spends 20 years in it and always leave with the parts of their brain pretaining to memory removed and given back to them in a jar. Ythandr is one of the very few devils that were born before the nine hells existed.
        The Trader: a quiet, strange being who pulls a cart full of strange magical items for no known reason. They wears a cloak that is always oily for some reason, a mask that completely hides their face, and large leather gauntlets that go up to their elbow. They only accepts other magic items of equal value for trade, and their stock is completely random, one day they may have only a +1 dagger, the next they may have multiple +5 vorpal swords. They are immune to all magical effects, including any forms of divination. If a PC asks a god or being with similar power about them, the god/other being will have no clue who they are talking about. They are friendly to the party, but will refuse to leave their cart or reveal any skin no matter what.
        The Poison Tree: The Primal Aspect of Knowledge, both good and ill. Uncovering new information is to be celebrated, even when it brings about ruin. Some scholars believe the tree is purely a metaphor, written about to conceptualize complex ideas in a primitive age; some believe it to be real, and strike out on lifelong journeys to find it and eat of its fruit.
        Eros: Referred to as 'The Mother of Monsters' in common parlance, this entity shares its name with the later goddess of love, though Eros is far more primal. It is love and lust in all of its forms, and its offspring and faithful are hybrids of monsters and humanoid species. Violent and terrible, the Forbidden Plateu of the Cult of Eros is home to rare species of beast and plant life. The very air there is said to corrupt mortals beyond recognition, twisting them into amalgams of man and monster.
        The Iron Pillar: Deep in the earth, it sings an endless song to all who dig toward it, though they do not understand it. Those who find it, fall to their knees in worship and expire in mortal terror.
        The Pig: a very strong woman with the head of a boar. The Pig can be found anywhere and everywhere as long as there is dim light. The Pig is a lawful neutral being that punishes those who try to defile the laws of nature. The Pig is said to be a failed experiment on how to prevent hunger but why the entity has lived for such a long time is beyond explanation. Those who have been killed by the hands of The Pig are found with no face and black ooze bubbling from a hole in their chest.
        The Yawning Willow: A sentient tree that speaks via the wind blowing through its leaves. The Yawning Willow is so old that it invented the language of druidic and has taught some of the first druids the ways of nature.
        Rinoir: he uses the body of a human once sworn in pact to Rinoir, now an avatar to him, as a demonic machine that has twelve mechanical arms protruding from the human’s old, withered, and blackened corpse. Rinoir is desperate to find a new host as his current one is getting more and more fragile as each year goes by.
        The Duke of Stone: a 20 foot tall being made of various stones and metals. The Duke of Stone is near impossible to describe due to their alien nature but some defining features are its many eyes and sharp, jagged body (if that even is a body at all). The Duke of Stone is a creature who takes joy in learning of its prey before petrifying them and engulfing their stone body into its horrendous figure. The Duke is always joking about how it 'eats' and 'sleeps' like a fleshbag, thinking of any creature smaller than him as a toy.
        Qpljhyt: an entity made of a pink fleshy substance that forms into a circle. The name of this creature cannot be pronounced by any creature except for gods and powerful aberrant mind sorcerers. Qpljhyt has been around since the creation of the material plane and will only give information to those who he wishes to give information to. Qpljhyt cannot attack but can use a special reaction to force a creature to make a DC 28 intelligence saving throw, on a failed save the creature is reduced to 0 hit points and on a successful save the creature take 30+20d12 force damage. Any creature reduced to 0 hit points by Qpljhyt are erased from time and space. Qpljhyt has a hit point total of 4000.
        Talveer: A roughly humanoid figure made of grey living ropes bound together, wearing rough clothing that seems to be made from parts of various clothes and other materials sown together. They wander the wilderness, if encountered by heroes or others with potential, they will offer a strange quest. The rewards will be good, but the consequences of failure morbidly bizarre. Accept the quests at your own peril, follow every letter and you will be rewarded, a single mistake will be worse than death.
        The Night Owl: an immortal being who owns a demiplane where the sun never rises and the party never stops. Those who get trapped on his plane cease to age with the downside of never being able to escape the endless party.
        The Birds: Ancient beings of Shadowfell that seep into the material plane through their disciples. Nobody knows where The Birds came from or what their true intentions are, as each of their followers are given a different set of powers and directives, but they are powerful. Those who know of their existence speak of visions of thousands of voices speaking at once, being in the center of a tornado of black wings, and an overwhelming sense of dread.
        Thornhart: A very old, forgotten god of life and nature, may be offspring of (insert your god of nature). His appearance resembles a massive hart with white fur tinged with green as if moss has been growing over him, with antlers made of interwoven vines covered in blooming flowers of all colors. A rainbow rack, it's called. Once long ago he was worshipped as a god of protection, rewarding those living close with nature. Now all he protects is his own Grove, mostly forgotten by all except the oldest of druids. He is standoffish to an irrational degree towards all but the most reverent of druids.
        Stormpale: A very old, forgotten god of war and death, may be offspring of (insert your god of war). His appearance is a massive falcon (about the size of a young red dragon) whose feathers are so black they seem to drink the light. He appears as though he's a shadow in the sky, or rather, a shadow projected onto the sky. The only part of him that is not inky blackness are his red eyes, which don't so much glow as they seem to reflect light back in a red haze. Seeing him in the sky has long been considered a very ill omen, portending war, famine, or death of some sort. However, at this point, being forgotten for so long, he is simply lonely, and is content to have a conversation with anyone.
        Arachae Cythalia: roughly translated from deep speech meaning queen of spiders, Arachae Cythalia is a spider with an old hags face and human feet on each of its ten spider legs. Arachae Cythalia has been building a web from the deep realm to the material plane and she will soon achieve her goals. Arachae Cythalia believes she deserves to be the goddess of spiders and intents to kill the current god of spiders. Arachae Cythalia gives birth to a freakish human spider hybrid race that has not been seen by anyone in the material plane. The ettercap species is considered a perversion of spiderkin to Arachae Cythalia and plans to cause a mass extinction to all ettercaps.
        Dreamstalker Child: an undead entity that manifests primarily in dreams, travelling from one dreamer to the next. It appears as a young child with an indistinct face that cannot be remembered, wearing a tattered grey linen tunic. If the dreamer reacts with fear or hostility towards the child, it will begin stalking them during waking hours. Small knife cuts will appear on the stalked person's body. If they walk near a dark doorway, they will feel a small hand grab them and try to pull them inside.
        The Golden Thrush: a small, plump bird with large, inquisitive eyes. Its plumage is brilliant gold, with brown spots and a white underbelly. Its song is a sparkling high-pitched trill, audible for miles. It is actually a remnant of the consciousness of an ancient forest spirit. If it witnesses someone damaging the forest or attacking the native creatures therein, it defends its domain by diving at the trespasser at incredible speeds, plunging through their body like a bullet. If fed mistletoe berries, it will grant a boon and safe passage through its forest.
        Warden of Agathys: a large muscular devil with blue skin and horns made of ice as well as a pigs nose. The Warden of Agathys hold the flail of punishment which is a +3 flail that magically causes painful spasms. The Wardens job is to punish sinners who were vile enough to make it into such a deep layer. After doing the same job for three millennia The Warden has perfected the art of torture to a science.
        Duchess of Wasps: a giant wasp with a head set ablaze with purple fire. The Duchess of Wasps can speak telepathically to creatures and loves to feast on mortal flesh. The Duchess of Wasps very rarely allows for deals to be struck with mortals but when she feels generous she allows for them to get power in return for food that her children may eat. The Duchess of Wasps will lay eggs in her victims and wait for them to hatch. Her lair is filled with wasps and corpses of humanoids, goblins, trolls, dragons, beholders, etc. Legends say that The Duchess of Wasps was once a druid that has transformed into a creature as disgusting as her heart, others say she was the first wasp to ever fly, whatever her story is nobody can deny how old and how powerful she is with near impossibly potent venoms, acids, and Psionics capability.
        Epok, Tilin, and Merq: The Planestriders: A trio of Alhoons that travel between planes successfully hiding for decades at a time. Every thirty years, they return to the Material plane to repeat their ritualistic sacrifices to extend their lives. They target weary travelers on quiet secondary roads. The story of these planestriders is thousands of years old.
        Scourge: a giant reptilian beast from a time long before man existed. It resembles a Tyrannosaurus with wings and horns. It can use a sonic roar as a breath weapon and break down fortified walls. It is said any city he visits is depopulated and left in ruins.
        Gnorman, The Gnomish Sythesist Summoner: He's an incredibly old gnome who at this point cant survive outside of his eidolon and is incredibly powerful. He spends most of his time making discount magic gear and supplies for the needy. The eidolon takes the form of a large mass of black tentacles.
        The People's God: A sentient, if simple mind created on accident via the arcane architects when a great ritual tripled the size of their city overnight. The People's God, or 'Ol Watchful, as it's called colloquially, is omniscient within the walls of the city and can be asked questions via prayer, though the answers are vague at best, nonsensical at worst. It's whispered that a band of vigilantes and a handful of neighborhood watches have learned to access it's knowledge in a more precise manner, and will go to extreme lengths to keep that knowledge out of the hands of the law. Many have claimed to see Ol’ Watchful but appearances vary from story to story and usually come from unreliable sources.
        Heart of The Undead: a mass of black flesh and rotten plant matter located in the shadowfell. The Heart will convulse occasionally and create a wave of necrotic energy from its convulsion. Any non undead who are within a 200,000 foot radius of The Heart while it convulses will take 4d12 necrotic damage. Those who die from the necrotic wave are resurrected as zombies. It is uncertain of the connection between The Heart and undead as a whole but it seems like undead try to protect The Heart.
        Shatterquake: An ancient continent-sized Earth Elemental. It is said its steps could cause the very continental plates to shift. It slumbers now, and a family of Halflings have began unknowingly cultivating life from its back. One day, it may awaken.
        Yiith?: Long ago. when a cerebrilith devoured the mind of a minor god, its temple home was sealed away, the whole pocket dimension locked for eons and eons in fear of the demon leaking out divine secrets or power into the rest of the world. When the makeshift tomb was finally unsealed, all that was found besides bones and dust was a single sea snail, dull and healthy. It MIGHT be the cerebrilith Yiith, morphed into this inconspicuous form as a disguise or a side-effect of absorbing the god's magic. Either way, the explorers that raided the ancient home knew of its history, and have taken great care to ensure that this possibly-volatile creature stays under lock and key.
        Saurothid: What remains of an extremely powerful fiendish entity that was heavily wounded long ago. It is mindlessly spawing lesser monsters in its crippled state, and despite having powers that exceed even the most powerful wizards, it wants to die and will not actively resist against the party trying to kill it. Though it’s endless army of lesser devils and its aura of heat and darkness will still make killing Saurothid a difficult task.
        Fuishtar: known by some as The Great Scorcher, Fuishtar is a gargantuan fire elemental that can speak directly to the god of war. Fuishtar is a servant to the god of war and is used as a messenger by the god of war. There is a legend of a battlefield where both sides prayed for the removal of a tarrasque so that they may fight. Their prayers were answered and Fuishtar stayed the monstrosity, the cost of his services is that all tarrasque from them onward had immunity to fire.
        The Illumin: They are not known to engage with humans openly. But now and then, those who went spelunking or miners trapped in caves found themselves either led out by a mysterious light being. Or sometimes, led deeper in. The stories told around them are often suggestive that when someone becomes trapped in the dark, they measure a person by whether or not they bring light to others. Then choose to appear and lead them to whatever the Illumin wish them to see. Perhaps it is safety or their end. But whether or not the beings truly gauge such things or if they are each with their own whims and choices is not known to mortals. The Illumin themselves are creatures of the dark, deep, and below places. They are often compared to feyfolk or changelings but some scholars have theorized they share things in common with bioluminscent cave mushrooms or spores. They disappear in areas of light, and can shape themselves as they wish. Another more accepted theory is that they are the result of hallucinations and that they do not truly exist.
        Jack O’The Roadside: A tall, pale human man in patched suit who casts no shadow. He is seen by travellers on the side of the road at night, playing a golden harp and inviting them to dance. Should they dance his beautiful melody he will begin to up in tempo until it’s the fastest song in all the lands. It is said that those who can keep up with Jack are granted good luck for 7 years but those who fail encounter naught but misfortunes.
        Altabach: A large snake, in the upper range of an anaconda, with off-white scales and black eyes, fangs, and tailtip. Letters and words crawl over his skin like living text. He hoards secrets, and will answer two questions in return for the tongue of one's lover and the liver of a faithful hound.
        Stro The Patient: An immense egg that, at first glance, appears to be made of stone. It is sunk partway into the ground, and lichen grows over its surface. No one is certain for how long it has lain there, but there is no doubt it is alive: it's surface is warm to the touch, and a slow pulse, almost like a heartbeat can be felt by those standing near to it. Those living in its proximity may find themselves falling under its psychic influence and performing strange tasks. The ultimate goal of the unborn creature, as long as if and when the egg hatch, remain unknown.
        Mother Hornwort: Ancient even by hag standards, Mother Hornwort's hunched figure emanates an aura of power. She rides a giant stork as a mount, and has been known to feed it those she dislikes. She is avoided by sensible folk, but other hags sometimes seek her out for her knowledge, services, or to offer supplication in hopes of earning her favour.
        The Giants Shadow: a peryton that has survived thousands of years feeding on hearts and slowly growing. The creature is now larger than a wyvern and its shadow resembles a giant instead of a human.
        Soul of Winter: a glowing blue light in the shape of a woman that appears on the coldest night in winter. Many have theories on who she is and why she comes but they all vary from culture to culture. One culture believes she collects the souls of the dead to be judged, another says she is a frost hag that revels in making the coldest nights even colder, some say she’s an illusion brought by frigid weather on the eyes of naive travelers, no one will really know for certain.
        Umaraka: a gargantuan sea serpent that guards the entrance into the abyss. Umaraka is worshipped as a god of darkness and the sea by many cultists. Umaraka can speak to its followers through dreams, usually asking for more living creatures to be sacrificed in its name.
        The Forgotten King: a once great king that fell upon a curse that would slowly turn him into a god of madness. The gods knew that while they could stop his horrid new form from arising they couldn’t help but watch as the abomination unfolded before their eyes out of morbid curiosity. The forgotten king has been cursed for 500,00 years now and looks like a deformed werewolf, having one hand being larger than the other, a horn protruding from his eye socket, sickly white colored fur, and pure white eyes. The Forgotten King has never transcended into godhood for the other gods refused to allow it. He now waits in his castles ruins waiting for his daughter (who’s been dead for many many centuries) to come back from her coronation as princess (an event that happened when he was still happy). Hearing him ramble on about how proud he is and how he will celebrate with tea can bring any man to tears.
        Sabaramha, The Dark Empyrean - The daughter of Tharizdun, Sabaramha is a six armed empyrean exceptionally talented in swords and life magic. Instead of the normal healing abilities that life magic would normally imply, Sabaramha's skills lie in the manufacture of diseases that can wipe out civilizations or the forced evolution of violent magical beasts.
        Oreglai, Shadow of Death - Oreglai appears as a giant rotting crow with a 2 mile long wingspan. All plants caught in its shadow wither and die, while creatures are afflicted with a horrible despair that can cause suicidal thoughts. Oreglai is infested with billions of insects that often reach gigantic sizes.
        Krullajer, The Fear Tyrant - This golden great wyrm turned shadow dragon feeds of fear itself. Fearing Krullajer himself will empower him and grant him immortality. Whereas, simple fear in general will also strengthen him, yet to a smaller degree. To seal away Krullajer, the gods built a magical artifact to make everyone and everything forget him. This artifact becomes more fragile as general worry, doubt, and fear spread across the world.
        Asherl-Khan, The Guilt of Gods - Khan, the former god of glory, was slain and reanimated as this undead husk of a god. Khan's artifact, The Mantle of Glory was also transformed into The Mantle of Guilt which now exhales an impossibly black fog that reanimates the fallen and converts undead into following Asherl-Khan's will. The other gods were too ashamed to face their former friend and thus had Sigil's Lady of Pain seal him away in one of her mazes.
        Voltius the Eternal: the oldest known vampire of the world. His large age and the gigantic quantities of blood he consummed granted him god-like abilities relate to his condition. He can smell any warm-blooded creature in a 3km radius, control blood with telekinetic power, making him able to slow down heart-rates, extracting precise quantity of blood, giving blood related diseases, etc..., shapeshift into anything, turn invisible, and is immune to any anti-vampires techniques. You can see his reflection in mirrors, holy water feels like water to him, he can go anywhere no matter if he was invited or not, sunlight doesn't do anything to him...The list goes on.
        The Renegade God: A Nameless God who, in ancient times, sided against his fellows Gods. His name was erased from history, an he was chained deep beneath the earth.
        The King of Flames: A powerful Titan residing in a blinding palace on the back of a giant Phoenix, by which he travels the world.
        The Three-Faced Tree: An enormous and ancient oak with three humanoid faces protruding from it. They will answer any question: one of the faces always tells the truth, one tells what the traveler would want to hear, and the last one always lies.
        Xurv: a death tyrant located somewhere in the abyss. Xurv has no grand scheme or plan to conquer, he simply enjoys inflicting pain. Xurv will float above the abyss scouring one layer at a time trying to find demons. When Curv finds one he shoots a laser at it obliterating any trace of its existence.
        Pam: a frail old human woman who just never seems to die. She has outlived her children, grand children, great grandchildren and so on for so many generations, but the pain of loss just doesn't seem to dissipate. This has left her a bitter old woman. She holds intimate knowledge of ancient societies because, well, she lived there and she often yearns for the 'good old days' when only sorcerers could make fire and magic couldn't be learned by any idiot who could open a book. She has attempted and failed at ending her own life and having it ended for her by provocation, but recently she has altered her strategy in life and is using her knowledge to indugle in a little necromancy. If she won't die, then neither will her great-great-great-great-great-great-grand children. If she succeeds, she will be united with her huge extended, risen again, family.
        The Forge: The Forge is a sentient entity...a golem of sorts. The Forge acts more as a portal when a hero commits their first great deed (I.e. slaying a dragon or protecting a kingdom) the Forge will appear out of nowhere, often emerging from nearby water sources of from the shadows. its 12-foot tall stature consumes the hero and they wake up within the Forge. They have the honor of watching the forge create their very own custom magical weapon.
        Old Rambler: A bark-encrusted quadrupedal humanoid with a skull that channels it's slow breaths through pipe-like protusions. It’s breath acts as a thick fog and any living thing that breathes in the fog takes constant acid damage, but is revived with increased vitality an hour after leaving it's presence. The Old Rambler wanders slowly through the swamps of which it is considered a patron.
        The Walker: Nobody's sure of this being's real name, or even what they look like; the Walker has appeared as male, female, elven, human, dragonborn, and many other races besides. Regardless of their form, the Walker is always found walking down a road or path, surrounded by golden motes of light. They have never been seen leaving or arriving anywhere. If the Walker is spoken to politely, they will reply and offer to grant the person 'a light to watch their path'. When the person accepts, one of the lights that surround the Walker will start orbiting them instead, and will keep doing so until they die (when it flies off in a straight line, presumably back to the Walker.) If questioned about the direction of their journey or why they have lived so long, they will reply, 'Does the walker choose the path, or the path the walker?'
        The Myriad Faced One: a colossal entity that has tens of faces and hundreds of arms. He lived for trillions of years and is located at the intersection of all the planes of the multiverse. His goal is to fusion all planes to create a single perfectly balanced plane.
        Ugami: the first ever skeleton, sometimes called the ever-living warrior. Ugami had made a pact with a warlock to remain living forever so he can fight for eternity. The wizard agreed and now Ugami lives in an ancient dungeon waiting for his next foe. Centuries underground has left Ugami completely insane.
        Melezabeth: A severed undead head of an ancient giant, kept unliving only by its unsatiable gluttony. It has no bowels and everything it devours comes right through it, chewed and dropped from between all tangled sinews and veins that hang from its stump of a neck, all resembling grotesque tentacles and pseudopods. Melezabeth is mostly immobile, sitting atop of the ancient bottomless well, losing all its meals to the void beneath it. It can crawl, albeit very slowly. It can't be satiated, even with the help of its many cultists, which sacrifice countless victims to Melezabeth's all-devouring maw. Its minions suckle black goo from its disguisting arteries, like lambs of an undead goat, which gives them supernatural strength to do Melezabeth's bidding. They say the head has hypnotic abilities and when fought, it will often cannibalize its minions to instantly regenerate portions of health, catching prey with veiny tentacles and shooting nauseating goo from its swollen body.
        The Cottage: Deep in the Far Realm, protected by an unbreakable bubble of force, lies a small, picturesque, thatched country cottage, floating on an floating island of land with a small pasture for two or three sheep, a small wooden shed, and a vegetable garden. Two elderly humans can occasionally be seen, puttering about the garden, milking the sheep, or caring for the cottage in some way. Ancient tomes and beings with such knowledge describe them simply as The Husband and The Wife, but that is largely the entirety of knowledge about them. They, or similar beings, have lived in The Cottage unchanged for millennia. The bubble in which they exist is utterly unbreachable, even by divine power or spells that effect the nature of reality itself, such as Wish. Any attempts to reach the inside of the bubble result in the breacher being hurled from the area with insane speed and force. Anyone attempting to contact the couple through the bubble will be greeted with friendly nods and waves, but no other attempts at communication.
        The Abstract: The result of a failed attempt at Lichdom. The wizard was left a torn and deformed being; immortal but cut off from magic. They cannot cast spells of their own. Instead their aura perverts the magic of those around them. Twisting and tainting the effects of spells and magic items or weapons.
        Chirpy: A delightfully round songbird. Nobody can fully identify its species but know it to be a magical being of some kind. Chirpy is a primordial creature and despite having powerful magical potential still has the mind of a bird. They cannot be killed permanently by anything short of a god and when out of sight are capable of traveling from one point to another in an instant. Chirpy finds people interesting and will follow anyone who shows it affection.
        Liliveth: An ancient Oracle of a long forgotton deity who lives on an island in the middle of the ocean. She represents the turning between day and has two presences: She who walks the light, and she who walks the dark. She resides in two temples built into opposite halves of a mountain. The light temple is filled with light and magic based puzzles. The night temple is filled with dangers and fights taking place in magical darkness. At the end of each, she is sitting upon a throne. Small and frail but radiating with power. In the light, she will answer any three questions you ask, three answers, two truths, and one falsehood. In the dark, she will answer one question per individual, but the answer always rings true, and the asker may not like the answer. After a group leaves her temples, they will not open their doors again for anyone for 1,000 cycles of sun and moon.
        The Savior: a 7 foot tall angelic being with large white eagle wings, unnaturally pale skin, and no face. The Savior is rarely seen and seldom heard of. When a hero is doomed The Savior will come down and protect them from the fatal blow. Some say The Savior is a solar of the goddess of fortune but it is impossible to say for certain. Sightings of The Savior go back farther than elven history.
        Keeper of The Body: a large grey mass that gives off immense amounts of heat and exists just beyond the edge of the universe. Very few have spoken to it but those who have had to pass an intense trail of strength to unlock a stone door with celestial writings saying 'I Feel All'. Those who have spoken to The Body gain a feat called Fragment of the body which grants the creature +2 constitution and advantage on constitution saves. The Body tells all it meets that it must reunite with its kin.
        Keeper of The Mind: a large blue crystal with other crystals attached to it resembling a pattern that gives off a strange sense of pressure and exists just beyond the edge of the universe. Very few have spoken to it but those who have had to pass a difficult trail of mental fortitude to unlock a stone door with celestial writings saying 'I Know All'. Those who have spoken to The Mind gain a feat called Fragment of the mind which grants the creature +2 intelligence and advantage on intelligence saves. The Mind tells all it meets that it must reunite with its kin.
        hearing about a powerful npc
    D10 Barbarian
        He was the muscle in a crack commando unit.
        He's waging a one man war against the evil hill giants plaguing his tribes lands.
        His rough exterior hides a jolly friendly soul.
        He wears the skulls of his fallen enemies as adornments on his armor.
        His tribe pillaged a frontier fort recently. They left no survivors.
        He was surrounded by six of the kings best soldiers. He killed them, then ate their hearts and drank their blood.
        He's actually an animal, chief of a tribe of lycanthropes.
        His endurance is legendary. He wrestled a dragon for two nights and two days straight.
        His endurance is legendary. He wrestled his way through the entire red light district in two days and two nights.
        He's a ferocious berserker who loses all control in combat.
    D10 Bard
        He and his troop were sent up river for a crime they didn't commit.
        He moonlights as a thief. Everyone knows, but so far no one has been able to catch him in the act.
        He's on the run after using his honeyed words to cause a schism in the next kingdom.
        He moonlights as a vigilante do-gooder.
        He's a master of the old lore and spends his time spreading his knowledge among the villages.
        He's a dashing knave the tyrannical king has not been able to catch yet, and his poetic broadsheets periodically appear in public places mocking the government.
        He has a voice that could entrance even the most shrewish of the king's daughters.
        He's a washed up has been and hasn't been held in high esteem for many years.
        His music is the latest fashion and his name is on everyone's lips.
        He mostly just moonlights, wink wink nudge nudge.
    D10 Cleric
        His church is one of the few safe places in the region.
        He's a kind-hearted man who helps all in need.
        He moved heaven and earth to revive fallen heroes in his city's time of need.
        He's a member of a fearsome cult that holds the entire countryside in terror.
        He hunts members of other faiths with a dark devotion, then sacrifices them to his dark god.
        He's a fearsome necromancer who has bound all the dead in the region to his will.
        He is the the high priest of his god in the region. To his followers his word is law.
        He's a scholar first and a priest second.
        He's more politically motivated than faith driven.
        He's a promising young convert to his religion full of fervor.
    D10 Druid
        He's a wise leader of a small sect of like minded druids.
        He's a legendary protector of a secluded community.
        He's an emissary who acts as a go-between for the men and elves of the kingdom, solving disputes and keeping the peace.
        He's a hermit, maddened by isolation, who murders travelers.
        He's a dark druid who kills townfolk and uses their bodies to fertilize his grove.
        He's a good druid driven to dark deeds by men who hold his forest home hostage.
        He's a noted shapeshifter who prefers his beast forms to his human form.
        He's claims a body that heals itself is stronger than one magically healed.
        His accustomed home is the harshest land in the region.
        He occasionally turns up in town to barter rare medicinal plants for trade goods.
    D10 Fighter
        He was drummed out of the king's legion and was sent to prison by a military court.
        His skills are rumored to be a fraud, but no one has come forward with proof.
        He's a dangerous hired killer. For the right price he'll take any dirty job.
        He's a mercenary giant killer. His prices are exorbitant, but he's worth the money. The common folk consider him a hero.
        He's an up-and-coming dragon slaying folk hero. He's in it for personal reasons. The king fears he'll draw negative attention.
        He's a wandering troubleshooter. He's got a good heart, but even good folks have to have money to eat.
        He's a slow witted thug. Only the simple things in life, money, fighting, wenching, interest him.
        He's the best swordsman in the land and the right arm of the king.
        He's a hard bitten mercenary with a keen mind for stacking the odds.
        His weapon is a legendary artifact recovered during a dangerous quest.
    D10 Monk
        He's a member of an order sworn to poverty.
        He's a member of an order rumored to be sitting on a great treasure despite appearances of poverty.
        He's traveling the roads searching for an experience that will grant him enlightenment.
        He's a famous master of hand to hand combat. A drunken master.
        He's a wandering neophyte on a quest to prove himself to the monastery by doing good for others.
        His wisdom is legendary and people travel far and wide to seek his advice.
        His monastery is a safe home for the lost, the weary, and those orphaned by war or tragedy.
        He's a sworn killer serving a death cult.
        He's a mage killer sworn to the service of a dark master.
        He's a master of an evil and forbidden technique.
        D10 Paladin
        He's the one you can turn to if you have a problem, if no one else can help.
        He's a traditionalist armed with gleaming sword and polished shield.
        His weapon is a legendary artifact of good.
        He's a grey guard who cares more about the ends than the means.
        He's the champion of a dark, forgotten god.
        He's a champion of a dark god feared through the entire realm.
        He's a knight errant on a quest for his liege.
        He's a hard bitten monster hunter who only shows up when times are desperate.
        He's a famous dragon slayer.
        He never accepts payment for his aid.
    D10 Ranger
        His men are often willing to help if your cause is just and if you can find them.
        He's famous for slaying a dangerous beast that was preying on travelers along the roads.
        To the local orc tribes he's a boogeyman.
        He's a brutal bandit who strikes from hiding and never leaves survivors.
        He's a deceitful wanderer who hires himself as a caravan guide and leads innocents into ambushes of men and beasts.
        He hunts men and elves to harvest their organs, which he sells to mages for use in the most vile of spells.
        He's a sought after guide to the local wilderness.
        He is a legendary tamer of beasts. His animal companion is a legend in its own right.
        He's a well known army scout who retired a few years ago.
        The common folk pay him to protect their village from marauding humanoids.
    D10 Rogue
        Shortly after being imprisoned, he promptly escaped from a maximum security stockade.
        He has more treasure than the king stashed away in a dozen murky hiding places.
        He's due to be hanged in a few days. It seems he has escaped.
        He's a kleptomaniac, often weighted down with hot goods he needs to sell to anyone, at any price.
        He's well known to the locals as a knave who cons newcomers.
        The common folk are facing reprisals from the king as a result of his predations.
        He's a dangerous assassin who keeps grudges.
        He stole a legendary artifact from the lair of an evil death cult.
        He's a rebel do-gooder in a tyrannical kingdom and wooed the Baron's daughter to the rebel cause.
        The common folk overlook his more petty crimes because he tricked a group of bandits threatening the town into leaving.
    D10 Sorcerer
        Because no wizard academy will take him, he and his apprentices survive as soldiers of fortune.
        He's the heir of a powerful dragon.
        He has a strong preference for certain types of elemental attacks.
        His back is rumored to be covered in tattoos that move on their own.
        His wild an impulsive nature make him a dangerous agent for the side of good. There have been accidents.
        Although a practitioner of wild magic, he's actually a consummate scholar and researcher.
        He used his magic to help save the city from a besieging army of humanoids.
        He's a legendary monster. He used his magic to tear down the walls of a city and let an army of humanoids inside.
        He's part of a dark cult, raised from birth to take advantage of the magic in his blood.
        He lives for the thrill of combat.
    D10 Warlock
       For his crimes, he is still wanted by the government.
        He's the right hand of his evil patron in this world.
        No one knows how he got his powers, but the rumors are grisly.
        They say he's managed to subvert his patron and is now in control, using his powers for good. For now.
        He's turned his dark powers toward destroying even more frightening things than himself. The common folk fear its not for their benefit.
        He's not a full cleric, but his patron is a celestial.
        At night his patron takes control of his body.
        His eyes are empty of all humanity, and he makes choices with alien logic.
        Something even more powerful killed his patron and now he's unsure of his place in the world.
        He built a legendary temple to his patron in the wilds, protected by strange magics.
    D10 Wizard
        He used his magic to fend off an attack on the city by dark forces.
        He is the right hand of the king, a beloved ruler.
        He is the beloved head of the University and a master of it's library.
        He's hated necromancer, wanted for grave robbing.
        He's a con-man using magic to fleece the unwary.
        He's a legendary terror who nearly brought the kingdom to its knees not long ago.
        He's a noted traveler of the outer planes and has published several books on the subject.
        He's a collector of ancient lore, happy to accompany adventurers into a dungeon, or pay them for information they have recovered.
        He's a famous war mage with a quick temper. His familiar is a holy terror.
        He's a drunk with dangerous knowledge.
    Warrior
        DThis warrior fights with
        a brandistock, cunningly designed so that if it is twisted just right it will shoot out its blade like an arrow.
        an arquebus with an axe-head affixed to its stock for desperate close combat.
        a broadsword and buckler. Both have seen more combat than the warrior has, and wear it in their scars.
        a steel-shod club.
        a poleaxe with a head shaped like a grinning skull.
        a pike with a gilded tip.
        a serrated scimitar.
        a morning star with its head shaped to resemble a hedgehog.
        A sabre and its scabbard, which is sturdy enough to be used as a bludgeon and parrying tool.
        a partizan adorned with bloodstained feathers.
        a brace of pistols and a pair of daggers.
        a wavy flammenschwert.
        a tower shield painted with a roaring lion, and a long flail that can strike around it.
        a composite bow. They’ve notched vulgar insults into the shafts of all their arrows.
        a spear and kite shield. The spear bears a notch for everyone it’s killed, the shield for every time it’s saved the warrior’s life.
        a halberd with a bird’s nest impaled on its point.
        a glaive elaborated decorated to resemble a wickedly thorned rose.
        a rapier and a long knife.
        a sling with lead shot, and a seax for when the enemy gets close.
        a warhammer. Its head is shaped like an anvil.
        DThis warrior fights in
        clanking old half-plate.
        a corroded coat of chains.
        iron scale-mail molded to look like a pangolin’s armour.
        treated textiles tough enough to offer some protection, dyed in abstract patterns.
        mismatched pieces of armour taken off a dozen different bodies on a dozen different battlefields.
        rattling, ill-fitted lorica segmentata.
        roughly-stitched, muddy hides from animals large and small, furry and scaly.
        a breastplate polished to a bright sheen, and poofy brocaded silk sleeves.
        plates of shell and chitin pried from the flanks of man-eating war-beasts.
        a shredded mail hauberk with arrowheads inextricably stuck in its rings.
        a burgonet, jackboots, and boiled leather.
        splinted steel vambraces and greaves, a rusty coat of plates.
        an enamelled crimson cuirass.
        barding meant for a horse, hammered out to fit them.
        lacquered lamellar.
        a cloak reinforced with light metal plates, with chains wrapped around their forearms to help parry.
        leather trousers, hobnailed boots, and woad war-paint.
        an Almain rivet with a couple missing and dented plates.
        mirror armour, its central chest disc molded to resemble an open palm.
        a brigandine coat, its cloth soiled and torn.
        This warrior fights for
        a queen long dead, a country that no longer exists.
        the ecstatic trance they enter in the heat of battle, unmatched by any other pleasure they’ve experienced.
        revenge against the whole of the world.
        just enough pay to get them high.
        the fulfilment of their unconscious deathwish, so that they may join their fallen comrades.
        the perfection of their technique, so that they may teach the next generation of warriors.
        the only god who ever answered their prayers, a bloody and rapacious thing.
        no other reason than it comes easily to them.
        the chance to stare into someone’s eyes as they die.
        an escape from the bonds of civilized society.
        an outlet for their sublimated frustrations.
        a plot of land they dream of retiring to.
        the chance to find an old enemy on the battlefield and finish their feud.
        the sake of accumulating sin to join their damned love in the hereafter.
        a fiery and uncompromising faith.
        the approval of a father no longer able to grant it.
        accolades and trophies.
        the funds to found a warrior’s paradise.
        the satiation of a curse which demands they spill ten drops of guilty blood for every drop of innocent blood they’ve taken, or else suffer unimaginably as their veins smoulder from within.
        the naked truth they believe to be revealed in life-or-death situations.
        DThis warrior stands out on the battlefield
        for their obstinate ferocity. They have never retreated from a battle without being dragged by their companions.
        for their blood-curdling war-shouts.
        for their calm and clear sight even in the thickest fog of war.
        for the elegant execution of their enemies.
        for the technical precision of their fighting.
        for their graceful, dance-like movements.
        for their unpredictable speed.
        for their brutal strength.
        for their numb resistance to pain and wounds.
        for their disrespect to fallen opponents.
        because they seek out the strongest-seeming foes to fight.
        because of their towering height and abnormal reach.
        for the nigh-impassable wall that is their guard.
        for their opportunistic hit-and-run tactics.
        for their impeccable observation of proper battlefield decorum, and fair treatment of prisoners.
        for the way their charismatic presence lends their fellows courage.
        because of the sweet scent of the perfume they douse themself with before every battle.
        for the way they can predict their opponents and plan ten moves in advance.
        for the sheer dumb luck they must have to survive their own clumsiness.
        for their dirty tricks and unflappable wit.
        DWhen this warrior cries out in their sleep they are reliving
        the moment they squandered an entire campaign’s worth of pay on an ill-advised gamble.
        the beatings they suffered at the hands of their mentor.
        when they had to hide among the reeking dead and were trampled beneath them all the same.
        a duel they lost by their overconfidence, and survived only due to cowardice.
        a campaign they marched for so long they forgot the smell of home.
        a rout so total that more were killed by the weight of their fleeing comrades than were on the blades of the enemy.
        a combat fought in tunnels so close you couldn’t swing a sword.
        a battle fought within fading firelight, those at the sputtering edge picked off by blind enemies.
        an ambush when they were caught wading waist-deep through mud.
        a terrible trip they suffered because of the hallucinogenic venom smeared along an enemy’s weapon.
        the moment they realized they were going to live and die by the sword.
        a fight against a monster no mortal weapons could scratch.
        the moment they received a wound whose scar still aches even all these years later.
        the turning point of a battle when those they thought were steadfast allies betrayed them.
        a time they thought they’d found peace fell into chaos once more.
        the loss of their dear love while they were away on campaign.
        the long sickness that wasted away their hard-earned strength.
        the civil schism that turned them against their brother.
        when a priest cursed the warrior with their last breath.
        the moment they sold out their comrades who planned to desert their army.
    Bard
        A talented singer.
        A graceful dancer.
        A virtuoso musician.
        A captivating storyteller.
        A brilliant poet.
        A scholar of history.
        A serious actor.
        A dashing swashbuckler.
        A wise-cracking magician.
        A bold knife-thrower.
        A slippery con artist.
        A lovable jack-of-all-trades.
        A duplicitous spy.
        A witty satirist.
        A gracious knight.
        An enchanting dancer.
        A mysterious foreigner.
        A rowdy jester.
        A master of riddles.
        A terrible singer.
        d20 Always prepared to make a melody or rhythm, the bard carries his/her...
        Bagpipes.
        Bells.
        Castanets.
        Cymbals.
        Drum.
        Fiddle.
        Flute.
        Harmonica.
        Harp.
        Lute.
        Lyre.
        Mandolin.
        Ocarina.
        Panpipes.
        Shawm.
        Tabor.
        Tambourine.
        Trumpet.
        Viol.
        Zither.
        d10 The bard’s musical instrument is...
        A gift from a wealthy patron.
        A family heirloom.
        Very old, but well maintained.
        An old, worn-out thing.
        In need of some repair.
        Always out-of-tune.
        Decorated with gold.
        The product of a master craftsman.
        Something the bard made.
        The instrument of a legendary bard.
        d12 If things get rough, the bard has...
        Several sharp daggers.
        A lightweight saber.
        A finely-crafted shortsword.
        A longsword and a good luck charm.
        Some well-balanced throwing knives.
        A quick-winding crossbow.
        A bow of elvish make.
        A shortsword of dwarvish make.
        A heavy wooden staff.
        A dagger in each boot.
        A book of hexes and curses.
        Quick wits and a gift for lying.
        d12 The bard also carries...
        A compromising love letter.
        A lacy favor from a maiden.
        Some parchment with half-finished poems.
        Some faded sheet music.
        A silk handkerchief.
        The key to well-guarded treasure chest.
        A bundle of old books.
        An alchemy kit and several potions.
        A pocket field guide to local herbs.
        A faded old map.
        A tome of legends and historical lore.
        A jar of mustache wax.
        d12 The bard is wearing...
        Tight-fitting pants.
        A low-cut shirt.
        A revealing set of breeches.
        A traveler’s cloak.
        A heavy peddler’s pack.
        A wide-brimmed hat with a large exotic feather (d10): cockatrice; giant eagle; giant owl; griffon; hippogriff; ostrich peacock; phoenix; roc; shadowraven.
        Shiny boots made from an exotic hide (d8): basilisk; crocodile; demonskin; dragonscale; drake; flamesnake; lightning lizard; wyvern.
        A coat made from an exotic hide (d6): dragonscale; leopard; owlbear; sharkskin; tiger; zebra.
        A large golden necklace.
        Flashy earrings.
        Dancing shoes.
        Too much perfume.
        d12 The bard has...
        A silver tongue.
        A gift for satire and wit.
        A beautiful face.
        Incredibly good looks.
        An easy smile.
        A graceful manner.
        A polite gentility.
        Impeccable manners.
        A foul mouth.
        A hearty laugh.
        An alluring quality.
        A handsome mustache.
        d12 The bard is looking for...
        A new tale to tell.
        Inspiration for a song.
        A beautiful muse.
        Someone to repair a musical instrument.
        A catchy melody.
        Experimental harmonies.
        An edgy dance move.
        A word that rhymes with “hippopotamus.”
        New styles of poetry.
        A legendary artifact.
        A hero to immortalize in song.
        A night of drinking and merrymaking.
        d10 The bard is always a big hit among...
        Fishermen, sailors, and pirates.
        Farmers and herders.
        Miners and travelers.
        Guards, soldiers, and sellswords.
        Members of the nobility.
        Young children.
        Idealistic youths.
        Serving girls, slaves, and harlots.
        Pretty young maidens.
        Lonely wives.
        d12 The bard tells a tale of a recent visit to...
        A royal court.
        A dangerous mountain.
        A legendary tomb.
        A distant castle.
        A frightening lair.
        A celebrated tournament.
        A foreign land.
        A witch’s home.
        A dark prison cell.
        A grand festival.
        A savage and wild land.
        A haunted castle.
    Thief
        d12 The thief is...
        A veteran dungeon delver.
        A desperate footpad.
        A reckless fortune seeker.
        A well-known adventurer.
        A brash, young fool.
        A student of the craft.
        A charismatic swindler.
        A mysterious foreigner.
        A femme fatale.
        A charming rogue.
        A dashing swashbuckler.
        A brutish thug.
        d12 The thief has...
        A long, hooked nose.
        A bent, broken nose.
        A cute little button nose.
        A scar below the left eye.
        Pockmarked cheeks.
        High cheek bones.
        A pointy chin.
        A thug's tattoo on the arm (d8): crossed bones; dagger; dragon; eagle; skull; snake; spider web; thorns.
        A sailor's tattoo on the arm (d6): anchor; fish; mermaid; octopus; shark; whale.
        An open shirt and a very hairy chest.
        A five o'clock shadow.
        An extravagant mustache.
        d12 The thief wears...
        A flashy earring.
        A dark red cape.
        Shiny leather boots.
        Boots with a hole in the left toe.
        A leather baldric.
        A wide-brimmed hat.
        A heavy gold chain around the neck.
        A long dark ponytail.
        Luscious golden curls.
        A ruffled shirt.
        A stylish coat.
        A handkerchief in his breast pocket.
        d20 The thief carries...
        Some hemp rope and a silk handkerchief.
        Several over-sized sacks.
        Several torches and a much-used knife.
        A pocketbook of notes and maps.
        A dagger in each boot.
        A beautiful antique scabbard.
        A well-worn lantern.
        Climbing gear—pitons, hammer, and rope.
        An organized set of lockpicks.
        A crowbar.
        An adjustable lockpick.
        A mask.
        The token of a love.
        Letters for blackmail.
        A lucky charm (d4): rabbit's foot; lucky coin; horseshoe; four-leafed clover.
        A flask of oil.
        A treasure map.
        A flask filled with spirits.
        A wineskin.
        A little jar of mustache wax.
        d6 The thief...
        Hums or sings while walking.
        Constantly brushes the hair back from out of his or her face.
        Laughs maniacally at everything.
        Never smiles and never laughs.
        Scratches the elbow frequently.
        Picks at his or her teeth after meals.
        d10 The thief is armed with...
        Brass knuckles.
        A shortsword.
        Several throwing knives.
        A crossbow with poisoned bolts.
        A narrow-bladed dagger.
        A serrated dagger.
        A club and a knife.
        A rapier.
        A hand crossbow.
        A garrote and a dagger.
        d10 The thief is looking for...
        Accomplices to carry out a job.
        Revenge against a rival thief.
        Revenge against an officer of the law.
        An easy mark.
        Extra muscle for a job.
        Rumors that may lead to a big score.
        An ear to listen to some boasting.
        The location of storied item of value.
        Someone more wealthy than you.
        A rowdy evening of carousing.
        d8 The thief's modus operandi is...
        Petty theft.
        Burglary.
        Shoplifting.
        Mugging.
        Pickpocketing.
        Running heists of gems and precious metals.
        Running heists of warehoused commodities.
        Holding up outgoing boats or wagons.
        d6 The thief prefers to operate...
        Alone.
        With a partner to provide extra muscle if things get rough.
        With a partner to serve as a look-out.
        With a partner to create a diversion.
        With a gang.
        Wearing a mask.
        d8 Aside from theft, the thief has been known to be involved in...
        Distributing drugs (d4): smokeleaf; hallucinogenic mushrooms; sleepysalt (a downer); sharpsugar (an upper).
        Fencing stolen gems and precious metals.
        Assassinations that look like accidents.
        Assassinations that frame someone else.
        Running brothels (d3): exotic; low; high-class.
        Shaking down legitimate local businesses for "protection."
        Shaking down scandal-plagued city officials.
        Serving as muscle for shady merchants and/or brothel-keepers.
        d20 Recently, the thief has been operating in or near...
        A residential district.
        An artisan's shop or guildhall.
        A merchant's office.
        A inn.
        A brothel.
        A warehouse or shipyard.
        A temple complex.
        A cemetery.
        The town hall.
        An abandoned guildhall or warehouse.
        A shantytown
        The residence of a wealthy individual.
        The palace
        A library or university.
        The market square.
        A gatehouse.
        A pub.
        A tavern.
        The docks.
        The bridge.
        d20 The thief's favorite marks include...
        Fishermen and sailors.
        Beggars and hobos.
        Merchants and moneychangers.
        Jewelers and gemcutters.
        Politicians and magistrates.
        Guards and sheriffs.
        Soldiers and sellswords.
        Musicians and storytellers.
        Farmers and herders.
        Servants and slaves.
        Priests and sages.
        Women and children.
        Peasant girls and farm wives.
        Young noblewomen.
        Old women.
        Noblemen.
        Harlots and madames.
        Barkeeps and barmaids
        Peddlers and shopkeepers.
        Other thieves.
    Watchman
       d12 The watch’s colors are...
       Black.
        Red / scarlet.
        Gold.
        Forest green.
        Royal blue.
        Silver / light grey.
        Brown / beaver.
        White.
        Maroon.
       Sky blue.
        Navy blue.
        Dark brown / chocolate.
        d12 The watch’s symbol is...
        A flame.
        A gauntlet.
        A shield.
        A sword.
        The sun.
        An eye.
        An eagle.
       An owl.
        A dragon.
       A lion.
        A raven.
        A wolf.
        d12 The watch’s captain is...
        A religious zealot.
        A scion from a prominent family.
        An outcast from a prominent family.
        A dashing swashbuckler.
        A brutish thug.
        A celebrated war hero.
        An anointed knight.
        A career soldier.
        A grizzled veteran.
      An adept investigator.
       An erudite detective.
        A devoted public servant.
        d6 The watch’s attitude toward their captain is...
        Friendly and loyal.
        Respectful and business-like.
        Completely indifferent.
        Cautious and uncertain.
        Terrified and tight-lipped.
        Disappointed and disrespectful.
        d10 The watch has a reputation for...
        High morals.
        Efficiency.
        Reliability.
       Brutality.
        Taking bribes.
        Shaking down shopkeepers and artisans.
        Frequenting brothels.
        Cowardice.
        Incompetence.
        Intoxication.
        d6 Most members of the watch are outfitted with...
       Rough-spun wool cloaks.
        Whatever armor they can find.
        Leather armor marked with the symbol of the watch.
        Leather armor marked with the symbol of their city or lord.
        Helms and breastplates emblazoned with the symbol of their city or lord.
        Well-maintained chainmail.
      d10 Most members of the watch are equipped with...
        Longswords and shortbows.
       Longswords and crossbows.
        Longswords and shields.
        Shortswords and shields.
        Maces and crossbows. ¬¬
        Maces and shields.
        Maces and daggers.
        Pikes and shortswords.
        Halberds and daggers.
        Halberds and crossbows.
    INDIVIDUAL INVESTIGATORS
      d10 The constable is...
        A priest or monk.
       A stoic monk.
        A former soldier.
        A mysterious foreigner.
        A pompous windbag.
        An accomplished scholar.
        A violent drunk.
        A criminal lackey.
        A popular tavern patron.
        Ruggedly handsome.
        d6 The constable works for...
        The steady pay.
        A chance to bring evil-doers to justice.
        Gold to repay debts.
        Gold to support his addiction (d4): drinking; gambling; harlots; smoking.
        The joy of solving mysteries.
        A chance for vengeance.
        d12 On the constable’s face is...
        A scar from a burn.
        A jagged scar.
        A hard-set jaw.
        A friendly grin.
        A faraway look.
       A furrowed brow.
        A pair of piercing eyes.
        A broken nose.
        Bushy eyebrows.
        Unshaven stubble.
        A neatly-trimmed beard.
        An intimidating mustache.
        d10 The constable carries...
        A magnifying lens.
        A blade with a carved hilt (d6): ivory; jade; soapstone; ebony; mahogany; oak.
        A blade with beasts sculpted into the steel of the guard (d6): dragons; lions; scorpions; snakes; spiders; wolves.
        A blade made of blackened steel.
        An unusual hat.
        A clue from an unsolved crime.
        A token from a lost love.
        Props for several disguises.
        Alchemical reference manual.
        A pocket-sized almanac.
    INDIVIDUAL GUARDS
       d10 The guard is...
        A farm boy.
        The son of a miner or fisherman.
        A veteran of warfare.
        A foreigner.
        The son of a poor man.
        A drunk.
        A reformed criminal.
        A thug.
        A failed craftsman.
       A favorite among the ladies.
        d6 The guard works for...
        The steady pay.
        A chance to deal out sadistic punishment.
        Gold to repay debts.
       Gold to aid a family member.
       A chance to escape from life imprisonment.
        Patriotic devotion.
        d12 On the guard’s face is...
        A large wart.
        An unsightly scar.
        A look of determination.
        A foolish grin.
        A stupid stare.
        A look of confusion.
        A bulbous nose.
       Bushy eyebrows.
        Fearsome sideburns.
        An unruly beard.
        A neatly-trimmed mustache.
        A waxed mustache.
        d10 The guard carries...
        A blade with soft leather tassels dangling from the pommel.
        A blade with an inscription.
      A highly polished blade.
        A token from a favorite harlot.
       A trophy from a criminal.
        A ribbon from a noble maiden.
        A silk handkerchief.
        A flask of wine.
        A lucky charm (d4): rabbit’s foot; old coin; shiny coin; four-leaf clover.
        A grocery list.
    Priest
        d12 The priest is...
        A devoted acolyte.
       A dogmatic chaplain.
        A wealthy chaplain.
        A grim exorcist.
        An adept healer.
        A road-weary pilgrim.
       A charismatic preacher.
        An eccentric scholar.
        A disillusioned scholar.
        A battle-tested warpriest.
        A sharp-witted witch-hunter.
        An outspoken zealot.
        d12 The priest has...
        A likable grin.
        A hearty laugh.
        An arrogant smirk.
        A haughty sneer.
        A humorless visage.
        A habit of sighing.
        A sad look on his or her face.
        A kind look on his or her face.
        A habit of pacing.
        A habit of scratching his or her chin.
        A habit of licking his or her lips.
       A habit of muttering under his or her breath.
        d12 The priest is particularly knowledgeable regarding...
        Alchemical curatives.
        Creation myths.
        Crusades and religious wars.
        Demonology.
       Healing arts.
       The journey of the soul.
        The laws of the gods.
        Sacred rites.
        Sacred texts.
       Saints and martyrs.
        The temple hierarchy and bureaucracy.
        Undead creatures.
        d6 The priest has recently been praying for...
        The death of an enemy or rival.
        The miraculous recovery of a friend or ally.
        Evil tidings and omens to pass over him or her.
        Strength against temptation.
        Wisdom in making an important decision.
        Forgiveness for his or her past sins.
        d12 The priest wears...
        A threadbare robe.
        A sturdy wool cloak.
        A comfortable linen robe.
        A robe that smells of incense.
        A cotton robe with the symbol of a god embroidered on the lapel.
       A clean silk robe with simple embroidery.
        An expensive silk robe with elaborate gold embroidery.
        Boiled leather armor.
        Patchwork armor of leather and steel.
        Armor that smells of scented, holy oils.
        Chainmail armor with a priest’s hood.
        Chainmail emblazoned with the symbol of a god.
        d12 The priest carries...
        A well-used cudgel.
        A shiny new mace.
        A walking staff.
        A staff with a crook.
        A ceremonial dagger.
        A prominently displayed holy symbol (d6): bejeweled; gilded; iron; silver; steel; wooden.
        A pocketbook of sacred texts.
        A notebook of hand-written prayers and devotions.
        A variety of healing potions and salves.
        A set of prayer beads.
        A heavy ring of keys.
        A wineskin.
        d12 The priest prefers to drink...
       Ale (d6): amber; brown; red; pale; wheat; white.
        Brandy.
        Lager.
        Mead.
        Milk.
        Pilsner
        Porter or stout.
        Tea (d4): black; green; herbal; sweetened.
       Red wine.
        Sour wine.
        White wine.
       Water.
        d10 The priest is looking for...
        New converts.
        The translation of an ancient manuscript.
        Heretics.
        Sinners.
        Donations.
        Relics and rare lore.
        Proof of a god’s existence.
       The location of a ruined temple.
       An opportunity to tell a fable.
        The bottom of a goblet.
    Noble
        d6 The noble is...
        A knight.
        An old lord.
        A young lord.
        An old lady.
        A young lady.
        A wealthy merchant.
        d8 The noble seeks someone to...
        Dispose of an enemy.
        Negotiate a trade contract.
        Deliver a letter.
        Prepare an army for war.
        Sabotage a rival.
       Secure an advantageous marriage for himself or herself.
       Secure an advantageous marriage for a friend or family member.
       Have a good time with.
        d6 The noble carries...
        Several deeds and titles.
        A family heirloom.
        Several inventories and invoices.
        Some very valuable jewels.
        A compromising love letter.
        A letter from a powerful lord or lady.
        d8 The noble wears…
        A flashy gold necklace or chain.
        Shiny leather boots.
        An ornate signet ring.
        Fine silk clothes.
       A handsome grin.
      An extremely ugly scowl.
       An arrogant sneer.
      Beautifully-styled hair and/or facial hair.
       d8 The noble has…
      A loud, deep laugh.
        A high-pitched laugh.
        A twittering nervous laugh.
        A nervous habit of fidgeting.
        A silver tongue.
        A commanding presence.
        Complete disregard for commoners.
        Not a care in the world.
    Sellsword
        d8 The sellsword is armored in...
        Exotic robes.
        Leather armor.
        Studded leather armor.
        Hide armor
        Ringmail.
        Chainmail.
        Scale armor.
        Plate armor.
        d6 The sellsword’s armor is...
       Shiny and new.
        In excellent condition.
        Obviously repaired, but serviceable.
        Covered in dings and dents.
        Dirty and well-worn.
        Barely held together.
        d12 The sellsword is wielding...
        A longsword.
        A longsword and a shield.
        Two shortswords.
        A shortsword and a shield.
        A bastard sword.
        A greatsword.
        A heavy flail.
        A morningstar.
        A huge axe.
        A warhammer.
        A scimitar.
        A scimitar and a shield.
        d8 The sellsword fights with...
        Hit-and-run tactics.
        Making a direct assault.
        Fancy footwork.
        Unpredictable lurches.
        Masterful combat maneuvers.
       No mercy.
        Lots of taunts and jeers.
        Dirty tactics.
        d12 The sellsword is...
        A well-trained soldier.
        A self-taught militia veteran.
        A veteran of gladiatorial combat.
       A veteran of warfare.
      A prisoner of war.
        A political prisoner.
        The son of a poor man.
        A drunk.
        A fugitive criminal.
        A former pirate.
        A de-frocked priest.
        A favorite among the ladies.
        d8 The sellsword fights for...
        The love of gold.
        Pure bloodlust.
        A chance to deal out sadistic torment.
        A chance at vengeance.
        Gold to repay debts.
        Gold to aid a family member.
        Gold to secure a marriage.
        Fortune and glory.
        d12 On the sellsword’s face is...
        An eye-catching mole.
        A garish earring.
      An empty eye socket.
        A grisly scar.
        A haughty sneer.
        A look of sadness.
        A stupid grin.
       An eager grin.
        A frame of long, beautiful long hair.
        Ferocious sideburns.
        An unruly beard.
        An intimidating mustache.
        d12 The sellsword carries...
        A blade with a gem embedded in the pommel.
        A blade with soft leather tassels dangling from the pommel.
       A blade with a carved hilt (d6): ivory; jade; soapstone; ebony; mahogany; oak.
        A blade with a gently curved hilt.
        A blade with beasts sculpted into the steel of the guard (d6): dragons; lions; scorpions; snakes; spiders; wolves.
        A blade made of blackened steel.
        A highly polished blade.
       A blade with runes carved into it.
        Arrows/bolts tipped with black steel.
        Arrows/bolts with bronzed tips.
        Arrows/bolts fletched with crow feathers.
        Arrows/bolts fletched with peacock feathers.
        d10 The sellsword is seeking...
        Accomplices on a mission.
        A fugitive on whom a bounty has been declared.
        A song to serve as a distraction from personal troubles.
        A long lost friend.
      The return of something stolen.
        Revenge against a bitter rival.
        Steady employment.
        A big pay day.
        Traveling companions.
        Drinking companions.
    Merchant caravans
        d6 The caravan is...
        A wagon train.
        A long wagon train.
        A small train of pack animals.
        A long train of pack animals.
        A train of pack animals with livestock.
        Traveling on foot with a few animals.
        d8 The caravan’s pack animals are...
        One-humped camels.
       Two-humped camels.
        Large draft horses.
        Reliable garrons.
        Sure-footed ponies.
       Mules.
        Oxen.
        Exotic beasts (d6): bison; drakes; elephants; elk; giant lizards; zebras.
        d6 The caravan is transporting...
        Cloth (d4): cotton, linen; silk, wool.
        Drugs or contraband.
        Gemstones (d6): diamond; emerald; jade; obsidian; opal; pearl; ruby; sapphire; topaz; turquoise.
        Metals (d6): arsenic; copper; gold; lead; silver; tin.
      Spices and teas.
        Wine and spirits.
      d4 The caravan’s general mood is...
       Desperate; a calamity has befallen them.
       Foul; morale is bad, and provisions are low.
        Tired; the journey is long and longer yet.
        Eager; great riches await at journey’s end.
    CARAVAN MASTER
        d8 The caravan master is...
        A mysterious foreigner.
        A career soldier.
        An outcast from a prominent family.
        A celebrated explorer.
        A femme fatale.
        A charming rogue.
        A dashing swashbuckler.
        A brutish thug.
        d8 The caravan master is looking for...
        Information regarding the route ahead.
        The location of an ancient ruin.
        Extra muscle for the journey.
        News from the origin or destination.
        Revenge against a bitter rival.
        Ways to cheat the caravan’s owner.
        Ways to speed up the caravan’s pace.
        Drinking companions and storytellers.
        d6 The caravan master is taking special care to avoid...
        Ancient ruins and cursed places.
        Barbarians.
        Bandits.
        Other caravans.
        Thieves.
        Wild beasts.
       d8 The caravan master carries...
        A superbly crafted sword.
        Several daggers and a purse of gold.
       A trusted blade and a map.
        A lucky charm (rabbit’s foot, old coin).
       The token of a faraway love.
        Extravagant jewels and silks.
        Keys of many shapes and sizes.
       A little jar of mustache wax.
    ANIMAL HANDLER/PORTER
       d6 The animal handler has...
       An awkward gait.
        Incredibly large hands.
        Holes in the breeches.
        Quite an odor.
       A threadbare shirt.
       A ragged beard.
        d4 The animal handler wants to...
       Earn a little silver.
       Go back home.
       Survive the journey.
        Have a drink and a rest.
        d6 The animal handler carries...
        A memento from a loved one.
        Several morsels of animal feed.
        Several morsels of food.
        A few copper pieces.
        A waterskin.
      A wineskin.
    COOK
       d4 The cook greets you with...
        A goblet of warm wine.
        A glass of water.
        A cup of cold porridge.
        A hearty handshake.
       d4 The cook is looking for...
        Someone more important to talk to.
        Some better ingredients.
        A good joke or story.
        The bottom of a bottle.
        d6 The cook carries...
       A filthy rag.
       A large wooden spoon.
        A grease-smeared apron.
        An unusual belt purse.
        A pouch full of spices.
        A bottle of whisky.
    GUARD
        d6 The guard is...
        The son of a miner or fisherman.
        A veteran of warfare.
        The son of a poor man.
        A drunk.
       A thug.
        A favorite among the ladies.
        d4 The guard works for...
        The steady pay.
       A chance to dole out pain.
        Gold to repay debts.
        Gold to aid a family member.
        d10 The guard has...
        An unsightly scar.
        A foolish grin.
        A stupid stare.
        A blade with an inscription.
        A highly polished blade.
        A token from a favorite harlot.
        A silk handkerchief.
        A flask of wine.
        A pair of dice or a deck of cards.
        A beautiful, waxed mustache.
    GUIDE
        d4 The guide is...
       A nomadic herder.
        A strange hermit.
       A skilled hunter.
       A savage warrior.
        d4 The guide is looking to...
        Help the caravan in any way.
       Lead the caravan astray.
      Fill his purse with gold.
       Eat, drink, and be merry.
        d4 The guide carries...
        An unusual map.
        A unique trinket or piece of jewelry.
        A spear or walking staff.
        A large knife and some rope.
    CARAVAN OWNER
        d6 The merchant is...
        A member of a trading clan.
        A minor lord or lady.
        An enterprising trader.
        A member of a prominent family.
        Of common birth.
        The real owner’s representative.
        d6 The merchant seeks someone to...
        Obtain a mysterious artifact.
        Negotiate a trade contract.
        Purchase goods.
        Sabotage a rival merchant.
        Secure a marriage.
        Have a good time with.
        d4 The merchant carries...
        A family heirloom.
        Several inventories and invoices.
        Some very valuable jewels.
        A compromising love letter.
        d4 Currency: The merchant will trade in...
        Coins and gems.
        Gold and silver bullion.
        Water, provisions, and other goods.
        Shells, beads, and trinkets.
    TRAVELER
        d6 The traveler is...
        An exile.
        A minstrel.
        A pilgrim.
       A sellsword.
        A storyteller.
        A treasure hunter.
       d6 The traveler is searching for...
        The answer to a riddle
        A long lost friend.
        The return of something stolen.
        Revenge against a bitter rival.
        New adventures.
        Steady work.
        d4 Tonight, the traveler is looking for...
        Accomplices on a quest.
        An audience to entertain.
        Someone to hear a sad tale.
        Drinking companions.
    qALCHEMIST
        d6 The alchemist is...
        An apothecary.
        A hedge wizard.
        An herbalist.
        A poisonmaker.
        A potioneer.
        A pyromancer.
        d4 The alchemist is looking for...
        Delivery help.
        New recipes.
        Purchasers.
        Rare ingredients.
        d4 The alchemist carries...
        Several vials of acid.
        Several curatives.
        An unusual potion.
       A pyrophoric substance.
    qCRIMINAL
        d6 The criminal is...
        An assassin.
        A con artist.
        A gambler.
        A poacher.
        A smuggler.
        A thief.
        d6 The criminal is looking for...
        Accomplices for a specific task.
        Revenge against a rival criminal.
        An easy mark.
        Extra muscle for some work.
        Rumors that may lead to a big score.
        A rowdy evening of carousing.
        d6 The criminal carries...
        A crossbow with poisoned darts.
        Several daggers.
       A short sword.
        A lucky charm.
       The token of a love.
       Letters for blackmail.
    qLAW OFFICIAL
        d4 The law official is...
        A constable.
        A sheriff.
        A guard captain.
        A magistrate.
        d6 The law official seeks someone to...
        Capture a fugitive.
        Catch a thief.
        Guard a specific location or person.
        Investigate a disappearance.
        Solve a murder mystery.
        Have an ale with.
        d4 The law official carries...
        An arrest warrant for an outlaw.
        A proclamation for a reward.
        A knife or sword of the office.
        A pocketbook of local laws.
    qNOBLE
        d6 The noble is...
        A knight.
        An old lord.
        A young lord.
        An old lady.
        A young lady.
        A wealthy merchant.
        d6 The noble seeks someone to...
        Dispose of an enemy.
        Negotiate a trade contract.
        Prepare an army for war.
        Sabotage a rival.
        Secure a marriage.
        Have a good time with.
        d6 The noble carries...
        Several deeds and titles.
        A family heirloom.
        Several inventories and invoices.
        Some very valuable jewels.
        A compromising love letter.
        A letter from a powerful lord or lady.
    qPRIEST
       d6 The priest is...
        An acolyte.
        A healer.
        A monk.
        A preacher.
        A scholar.
        A witch-hunter.
        d4 The priest is looking for...
        New converts.
        Heretics.
        Relics and rare lore.
        The bottom of a goblet.
        d4 The priest carries...
        A well-used cudgel.
        A prominently displayed holy symbol.
        A pocketbook of sacred texts.
        A wineskin.
    qSEER
       d6 The seer is...
        An astrologer.
        A fortune teller.
        A mystic
        A lorekeeper.
        A prophet.
      A psychic.
       d4 The seer is looking for...
        The answer to a riddle or prophecy.
      New clients for a reading.
        News regarding a missing person.
        Some juicy gossip.
        d4 The seer carries...
        A crystal ball.
        A dowsing rod.
        A large, sharp-pointed knife.
        Several star charts.
    qSMITH
        d4 The smith is...
        An armorer.
        A blacksmith.
        A farrier.
       A weaponsmith.
        d4 The smith is looking for...
        A new apprentice.
        A journeyman craftsman.
        Rare metals.
        A mug of strong ale.
        d4 The smith carries...
        A hammer.
        A metal trinket made by the smith.
        A contract commissioning a sword.
        Little more than a few coins.
    qTRAVELER
        d8 The traveler is...
        An exile.
        A minstrel.
        A peddler.
        A pilgrim.
        A refugee.
        A sellsword.
        A storyteller.
        A treasure hunter.
        d10 The traveler is seeking...
        Accomplices on a quest.
        The answer to a riddle
        An audience to entertain.
        A long lost friend.
        The return of something stolen.
        Revenge against a bitter rival.
        A permanent home.
        Steady work.
        Traveling companions.
        Drinking companions.
    qBARKEEP/BARMAID
        d8 The server greets you with...
        A mug of ale.
        A goblet of wine.
        A glass of water.
        An offer to move to a better table.
        A look of exasperation.
        A warm handshake.
        A pat on the back.
        A pretty smile.
       d6 The server is looking for...
        An excuse to kick you out.
        Someone more important to talk to.
        Someone to do some pest removal.
        A big tip.
        A good joke or story.
        The bottom of a bottle.
        d4 The server carries...
        A filthy rag.
        A pristine silk handkerchief.
        A piece of conspicuous jewelry.
        An unusual belt purse.












